Qt Frame Agreement Version 2024-02

1. PARTIES OF THIS AGREEMENT

1.1. This Qt Frame Agreement—comprised of these general terms together with the
appendices attached hereto, (hereinafter “Agreement”) is made by and between:

The Qt Company, as defined below (hereinafter ”The Qt Company”) AND Customer
name (hereinafter “Customer"):

Business Id (e.g. VAT or EIN number):

1.2. The parties above are hereinafter individually referred to as a “Party” and
collectively as the “Parties”.

2. STRUCTURE AND OBJECT OF THE AGREEMENT

2.1. The Parties have entered into this Agreement to agree on the terms and
conditions applicable to The Qt Company’s delivery of products and services
(“Services”) to Customer. 

2.2.  This Agreement is comprised of the following components:

This Agreement, which contains the general terms applicable to all Services,
Appendices for each of the Services, containing terms applicable to that
individual set of Services (“Service Terms”), a Qt Appendix for Pricing, if
applicable, which contains pricing for specific Services, and other
topic-specific appendices, such as Support or Marketing Rights. 2.3. Any and all
Services purchased shall be specified in, and agreed upon between, the Parties
under a separate purchase order, statement of work, quote, or similar document
(”Purchase Document”). Each Purchase Document concluded under this Agreement
shall include a reference to this Agreement and be governed by this Agreement.

3. DEFINITIONS

3.1. “Affiliate” of a Party shall mean an entity (i) which is directly or
indirectly controlling such Party; (ii) which is under the same direct or
indirect ownership or control as such Party; or (iii) which is directly or
indirectly owned or controlled by such Party. For these purposes, an entity
shall be treated as being controlled by another if that other entity has fifty
percent (50 %) or more of the votes in such entity, is able to direct its
affairs and/or to control the composition of its board of directors or
equivalent body.

3.2. “Contractor” shall mean third-party consultants, distributors and
contractors performing services to Customer under an applicable contractual
arrangement.

3.3. “Customer” shall mean the individual or legal entity specified in Section 1
above, that is a Party to this Agreement. 

3.4. “Force Majeure Event” shall have the meaning set forth in Section 11.7.

3.5. “Licensed Software” shall mean The Qt Company’s commercial software product
which is licensed for use by Customer under this Agreement and corresponding
Service Terms. Licensed Software shall include, if and to the extent applicable
and specified in the applicable relevant Service Terms, corresponding online or
electronic documentation, associated media and printed materials, including the
source code, and example programs. The Qt Company may in the course of its
development activities, at its free and absolute discretion and without any
obligation to send or publish any notifications to  Customer or in general, make
changes, additions or deletions in the components and functionalities of the
Licensed Software, provided that no such changes, additions or deletions will
affect the already released version of the Licensed Software, but only upcoming
version(s). Licensed Software is commercial computer software, developed at
private expense and offered to the public under standard commercial terms.

3.6. “Professional Services” shall mean The Qt Company’s professional-,
consulting-, training- and/or project services delivered to Customer under this
Agreement and specified in a Purchase Document.

3.7. “Support” shall mean maintenance and support services provided by The Qt
Company to assist Customer in using the Licensed Software, as further specified
in the Appendix for Support Terms.

3.8. “The Qt Company” shall mean:

in the event Customer is an entity residing in the United States or a legal
entity incorporated in or having its headquarters in the United States, The Qt
Company Inc., a Delaware corporation with its office at 3031 Tisch Way, 110
Plaza West, San Jose, CA 95128, USA.; or in the event Customer is an entity
residing outside of the United States or a legal entity incorporated or having
its registered office outside of the United States, The Qt Company Oy., a
Finnish company with its registered office at Miestentie 7, 02150 Espoo,
Finland. 4. PRICES AND PAYMENT

4.1. The Qt Company agrees to make Services available to Customer subject to the
prices set forth in the Appendix for Pricing. In the event that the Appendix for
Pricing does not include a price for certain Services, the applicable price
shall be the price agreed by the Parties in the respective Purchase Document.

4.2. All prices are exclusive of value added tax or other taxes, levels, or
duties. Value added tax as well as other possible public charges imposed by
authorities shall be added to the prices.

4.3. All fees under this Agreement are non-cancellable and non-refundable.     

4.4. All fees under this Agreement shall be paid by Customer no later than
thirty (30) days from the date of the applicable invoice from The Qt Company. 

4.5. Unless otherwise agreed or provided in the respective Service Terms or
Purchase Document, The Qt Company will invoice fees for:

4.5.1. Licensed Software and Support in advance upon conclusion of the Purchase
Document, and

4.5.2. Professional Services monthly in arrears after the Service has been
performed.

4.6. A late payment charge of the lower of: (a) one percent (1%) per month; or
(b) the highest interest rate stipulated by applicable law, shall be charged on
any unpaid balances that remain past due and which have not been disputed by
Customer in good faith within thirty (30) days of receipt of invoice from The Qt
Company.

4.7. The Qt Company may either (i) invoice Customer based on existing agreement,
(ii) request Customer to place a purchase order corresponding to a quote by The
Qt Company, or (iii) use Customer’s stored Credit Card information to
automatically charge the Customer for the relevant Renewal Term.

4.8. Unless and to the extent otherwise agreed in the Appendix for Pricing or in
the Purchase Document, The Qt Company shall be entitled to adjust the prices set
forth in the Appendix for Pricing by notifying  Customer of the change in
writing at least sixty (60) days before the effective date of the change. The
change shall not affect the current pricing term of Services agreed upon before
the effective date of the change. 

5. CONFIDENTIALITY

5.1. The Parties shall keep confidential, and shall not use or disclose to any
unauthorized third parties, the existence and content of this Agreement as well
as any Confidential Information received from the other Party or otherwise
learned in connection with the Agreement or the performance of the Services,
without the prior written consent of the other Party. Confidential Information
shall mean information that is designated as confidential or that would be
reasonably understood to be confidential given the circumstances of disclosure
and the nature of the information. The Parties shall not use Confidential
Information received from the other Party for any other purposes than the
performance of the Agreement or the fulfilment of their rights and obligations
hereunder.

5.2. Each Party shall limit access the other Party’s Confidential Information
only to those of its employees, subcontractors, Contractors, Affiliates or
financial or legal advisors who necessarily need access to the Confidential
Information for the proper performance of the Party’s rights and obligations
under the Agreement. Each Party shall ensure that the persons receiving
Confidential Information of the other Party are bound by confidentiality
obligations not less restrictive than those stipulated herein.

5.3. Each Party shall protect the confidentiality of the other Party’s
Confidential Information with at least  the same degree of security as it
exercises to its own confidential information, but no less than a standard of
reasonable care.

5.4. The confidentiality obligation stipulated herein shall not be applied to
material and information which:

has become generally available or otherwise public prior to its submission by
the other Party; becomes generally available or otherwise public due to a reason
other than the negligence or omission of the recipient or its personnel or other
actions in violation of this Agreement or  applicable legislation; the Party has
lawfully received from a third party without any obligation of confidentiality;
was lawfully in the possession of the receiving Party prior to receipt of the
same from the other Party without any obligation of confidentiality related
thereto; a Party has developed independently without using material or
information received from the other Party; or a Party must disclose pursuant to
law, decree or other order issued by competent regulatory or governmental body
or other public authority or a judicial order, in which case the Party shall, to
the extent permitted by applicable law, inform the other Party in writing of the
disclosure of information prior to such disclosure. 5.5. Each Party shall, upon
request of the other Party at any time, including upon termination, cancellation
or expiry of the Agreement, promptly destroy or deliver to the other Party any
and all the documents, files, copies and material containing Confidential
Information of the other Party. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a Party may
retain one copy of the Confidential Information in a secure location, if and
solely to the extent required to comply with applicable laws or regulations. Any
Confidential Information stored in electronic back-up form shall be rendered
inaccessible and destroyed in accordance with standard back-up procedures.

6. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS

6.1. Unless and to the extent expressly provided in the respective Service
Terms, this Agreement carries no assignment or license to the intellectual
property rights of either Party and all such rights are and shall remain the
exclusive property of the Party to whom such rights are vested under applicable
law at the signing of this Agreement or thereafter.

6.2. Where The Qt Company’s delivery includes any materials owned by a third
party, such third party materials shall be governed in all respects by the
applicable license terms of such third-party right holders. The Qt Company shall
duly inform the Customer whenever such third party materials are included in the
Services and of applicable license terms to be followed by the Customer in using
such third party materials.

7. FEES AND ORDERING  

7.1. Services Fees. Services Fees are described in the Purchase Document.   

7.2. Ordering Services.

Customer may purchase Services pursuant to agreed pricing terms or, if no
specific pricing terms have been agreed upon, at The Qt Company's standard
pricing terms applicable at the time of purchase. Unless expressly otherwise
agreed, any price or other term quoted to Customer shall only be valid for the
thirty (30) days from the date such price has been quoted. 8. LIMITED WARRANTY
AND WARRANTY DISCLAIMER

8.1. The Qt Company hereby represents and warrants that: (i) it has the power
and authority to grant the rights and licenses granted to Customer under this
Agreement; (ii) the Licensed Software will operate materially in accordance with
its specifications (as set forth in the applicable product documentation or,
where relevant, program description); (iii) Professional Services and Support
will be performed in a professional, workmanlike manner pursuant to the
Agreement; and (iv) during the ten years prior to the effective date of this
Agreement, there have not been any claims alleging that the Licensed Software
has infringed any intellectual property rights of a third party and, to the
knowledge of The Qt Company as of the effective date of this Agreement, no such
infringement exists. These warranties do not apply to issues arising from, or
relating to, any third-party materials or Customer’s use of the Licensed
Software in violation of applicable law or the terms of this Agreement.

8.2. Except to the extent set forth above, the Services are delivered to
Customer "as is" and to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law,
exclusive of other warranties, whether express, implied, or otherwise.
Customer’s sole and exclusive remedy and The Qt Company’s entire liability for
deficiencies or errors in the Services shall be limited, at The Qt Company’s
option, to correction of the error, replacement of the Services, re-performance
of the Service  or return of the applicable fees paid for the defective Service
for the time period during which Customer was not able to utilize the Service as
agreed. 

9. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY

9.1. EXCEPT FOR (I) CASES OF GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR INTENTIONAL MISCONDUCT, (II) A
BREACH OR VIOLATION OF THE OTHER PARTY’S INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS, OR (III)
WHERE REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE TO
THE OTHER PARTY FOR ANY LOST PROFITS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF BUSINESS OR GOODWILL
OR ANY OTHER INDIRECT, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL OR PUNITIVE COST,
DAMAGES OR EXPENSE OF ANY KIND, HOWSOEVER ARISING UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH
THIS AGREEMENT.

9.2. EXCEPT FOR (I) CASES OF GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR INTENTIONAL MISCONDUCT, (II) A
BREACH OR VIOLATION OF THE OTHER PARTY’S INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS, AND TO
THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT SHALL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL
AGGREGATE LIABILITY UNDER THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE AGGREGATE FEES PAID OR
PAYABLE TO THE QT COMPANY BY CUSTOMER FOR THE RESPECTIVE LICENSED SOFTWARE OR
SERVICE GIVING RISE TO THE LIABILITY. THE FOREGOING LIMITATION WILL NOT APPLY TO
CUSTOMER’S OBLIGATION TO PAY THE APPLICABLE FEES CORRESPONDING TO ITS  ACTUAL
USE OF LICENSED SOFTWARE OR SERVICES.

10. TERM AND TERMINATION

10.1. This Agreement shall enter into force upon signing by both Parties and is
effective as of the last date of signature.

10.2. This Agreement shall remain in force until further notice and may be
terminated without cause by either Party by no less than three (3) months’ prior
written notice to the other Party.   

10.3. Termination of a particular Purchase Document and the Services governed
thereunder shall be stipulated under the applicable Service Terms.

10.4. Either Party may terminate this Agreement with immediate effect, if the
other Party:

commits a material breach of the terms of this Agreement (including applicable
Service Terms) and has not remedied such breach within a reasonable period of
time (which shall be no less than thirty (30) days) of the non-breaching
Party’s written notice specifying the breach, or becomes bankrupt, insolvent or
goes into liquidation or debt restructuring. 10.5. Termination of this Agreement
shall, as such, have no effect on the validity of any Services ordered and
agreed prior to the effective date of such termination, and such Services shall
continue to remain in force pursuant to applicable Service Terms (including the
terms of this Agreement) for the remainder of the duration of the applicable
Service validity term. 

11. GOVERNING LAW AND DISPUTE RESOLUTION

11.1. The United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of
Goods will not apply to this Agreement. 

11.2. Where this Agreement is concluded with The Qt Company, Inc., a Delaware
corporation, the Parties agree that this Section 10.2 will apply. This Agreement
will be governed by, and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of
California and any controlling United States federal law. Any dispute,
controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this contract, including the
formation, interpretation, breach or termination thereof, and whether the claims
asserted are arbitrable, will be referred to and finally determined by
arbitration in accordance with the JAMS International Arbitration Rules. The
tribunal will consist of one arbitrator. The place of arbitration will be San
Francisco, California, USA. The language to be used in the arbitral proceedings
will be English. Judgment upon the award rendered by the arbitrator(s) may be
entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. This Section 10.2 shall not
preclude parties from seeking provisional remedies in aid of arbitration from a
court of appropriate jurisdiction. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any action by
The Qt Company solely to collect license or other fees hereunder may be brought
in any court of competent jurisdiction.

11.3. Where this Agreement is concluded with The Qt Company, Oy., a Finnish
company, the parties agree that this Section 10.3 will apply. This Agreement
shall be construed and interpreted in accordance with the laws of Finland,
excluding its choice of law provisions. All disputes arising out of or in
connection with this Agreement shall be finally settled in accordance with the
laws of Finland, excluding its choice of law provisions.  All disputes arising
out of or in connection with this Agreement shall be finally settled under the
Rules of Arbitration of the International Chamber of Commerce by one or more
arbitrators appointed in accordance with the said Rules. The place of
arbitration will be Helsinki, Finland. The language to be used in arbitral
proceedings will be English. This Section 10.3 shall not preclude parties from
seeking provisional remedies in aid of arbitration from a court of appropriate
jurisdiction.

12. MISCELLANOUS 

12.1. No Assignment. Customer shall not be entitled to assign or transfer all or
any of its rights, benefits and obligations under this Agreement except in case
of sale of relevant business or assets or otherwise with prior written consent
of The Qt Company, which shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed. The Qt
Company shall be entitled to freely assign or transfer any of its rights,
benefits or obligations under this Agreement.

12.2. Surviving Sections. Any terms and conditions that by their nature or
otherwise reasonably should survive termination of this Agreement shall so be
deemed to survive. 

12.3. Entire Agreement. This Agreement, its Appendices and any applicable
Purchase Documents constitute the complete agreement between the Parties and
supersedes all prior or contemporaneous discussions, representations, contracts
(including prior License Agreements and similar prior agreements), and
proposals, written or oral, with respect to the subject matters discussed
herein.

12.4. Subcontractors. The Qt Company may utilize subcontractors in the
performance of Services under this Agreement, provided that The Qt Company
remains responsible for the performance of the Services and compliance with this
Agreement, as well as ensuring that subcontractors are required to abide by
relevant restrictions (e.g., confidentiality) set forth in this Agreement.

12.5. Modifications. No modification of this Agreement shall be effective unless
contained in a writing executed by an authorized representative of each Party.
No standard terms and conditions or provisions of any Customer purchase order or
other ordering form that Customer may use in connection with the acquisition of
Services will modify or affect this Agreement, the parties agree that any such
terms and conditions are void with no legal effect.

12.6. Affiliate Orders. Customer Affiliates may purchase Services via this
Agreement as follows:

any purchases by Customer Affiliates from The Qt Company or its Affiliates will
create a contractual relationship directly between the relevant The Qt Company
entity and the respective ordering Customer Affiliate; the entry into a Purchase
Document between The Qt Company and Customer Affiliate creates an agreement
between The Qt Company and Customer Affiliate and incorporates all terms and
conditions of this Agreement as the governing agreement between The Qt Company
and Customer Affiliate (“Accession Agreement”): and Customer Affiliate will be
deemed “Customer” under the terms of this Agreement and all rights and
obligations under such Accession Agreement are vested and borne solely by the
ordering Customer Affiliate and the relevant The Qt Company entity as
contracting parties under such Accession Agreement. 12.7. Force Majeure. Neither
Party shall be liable to the other for any delay or non-performance of its
obligations hereunder in the event and to the extent that such delay or
non-performance is due to an event of act of God, terrorist attack or other
similar unforeseeable catastrophic event that prevents either Party for
fulfilling its obligations under this Agreement and which such Party cannot
avoid or circumvent (“Force Majeure Event”). If the Force Majeure Event results
in a delay or non-performance of a Party for a period of three (3) months or
longer, then either Party shall have the right to terminate the relevant
Purchase Document and Services thereunder with immediate effect without any
liability (except for the obligations of payment arising prior to the Force
Majeure Event) towards the other Party. 

12.8. Notices. Any notice given by one Party to the other shall be deemed
properly given and deemed received if specifically acknowledged by the receiving
Party in writing or when successfully delivered to the recipient by hand, fax,
or special courier during normal business hours on a business day to the
addresses specified for each Party in this Agreement. Each communication and
document made or delivered by one Party to the other Party pursuant to this
Agreement shall be in the English language.

12.9. Attorney Fees. The prevailing Party in any action to enforce this
Agreement shall be entitled to recover its attorney’s fees and costs in
connection with such action.

12.10. Privacy and Security. The Parties commit to and comply with their
respective applicable obligations under the privacy and security terms set forth
in the Privacy and Security Appendix and relevant Appendices attached hereto.

12.11. Feedback. Customer agrees that, from time to time, The Qt Company, may
request feedback from Customer regarding the Services (“Feedback”). Customer may
choose to provide Feedback and agrees that The Qt Company may freely use, copy,
disclose, and exploit any Feedback. No Feedback will be considered Customer
Confidential Information unless explicitly agreed otherwise between the Parties.

12.12. Export Control. Customer acknowledges that the Services, or portions
thereof, may be subject to export control restrictions under the applicable laws
of respective countries. Customer shall fully comply with all applicable export
license restrictions and requirements, economic sanctions restrictions, as well
as with all laws and regulations relating thereto, and shall procure all
necessary governmental authorizations, including without limitation, all
necessary licenses, approvals, permissions, or consents, where necessary (e.g.,
for re-exportation of the Redistributables, Applications and/or Devices, each as
defined in the relevant Service Terms).

12.13. Severability. If any provision of this Agreement shall be adjudged by any
court of competent jurisdiction to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision
shall be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that this
Agreement shall otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.

13. APPENDICES

13.1. The following appendices form an integral part of this Agreement. In case
of a discrepancy between this Agreement and any of its Appendices, this
Agreement shall prevail. In case of discrepancies between the Purchase
Document(s) and this Agreement or applicable Service Terms, the terms of this
Agreement or the applicable Service Terms shall prevail, except in cases where
an express deliberate deviation from the terms of this Agreement or applicable
Service Terms has been concluded pursuant to Section 2.3 hereof, in which case
the Purchase Document shall prevail.

Appendix for Qt Development Framework Version 2024-02, compliant with Qt Frame
Agreement 2023-06 or later

1. This Appendix for Qt Development Framework is an integral part of the
Agreement and specifies the legal terms for the licensing of Licensed Software
(as defined below) between The Qt Company and the Customer. Entry into this
Appendix governs the use of and supersedes any prior contracts between the
Parties (including prior License Agreements and similar prior agreements), with
respect to the Licensed Software under this Appendix.

2. DEFINITIONS

2.1. Capitalized words used in this Appendix shall have the meanings described
in the Agreement or as defined below. 

2.2. “Add-on Products” shall mean The Qt Company’s specific add-on software
products which are not licensed as part of The Qt Company’s standard Services
offerings, but shall be included into the scope of Licensed Software only if so
specifically agreed between the Parties.

2.3. “Application” means software products created using the Licensed Software,
which include the Redistributables, or part thereof. 

2.4. “End Customer” shall mean Customer’s customer(s) to whom Customer, directly
or indirectly, distributes copies of the Redistributables as integrated or
incorporated into Applications or Devices.

2.5. “Data Protection Legislation” shall mean the General Data Protection
Regulation (EU 2016/679) (GDPR) and any national implementing laws, regulations
and secondary legislation, as may be amended or updated from time to time, as
well as any other data protection laws or regulations applicable in the relevant
territory.

2.6. “Deployment Platforms” shall mean target operating systems and/or hardware
specified in the License Certificate, on which the Redistributables can be
distributed pursuant to the terms and conditions of this Appendix.

2.7. “Designated User(s)” shall mean the employee(s) of Customer or Customer’s
Affiliates acting within the scope of their employment or Customer’s Contractors
acting within the scope of their services on behalf of Customer. 

2.8. “Development License” shall mean the license needed by the Customer for
each Designated User to use Licensed Software under the license grant described
in Section 5 of this Appendix. Development Licenses are available per respective
Licensed Software products; each product having its designated scope and purpose
of use. 

2.9. “Development Platforms” shall mean the host operating system(s) specified
in the License Certificate, on which Licensed Software can be used under the
Development License. 

2.10. “Devices” shall mean 

hardware devices or products that are manufactured and/or distributed by the
Customer, its Affiliates, Contractors or End Customer, and incorporate,
integrate or link to Applications such that substantial functionality of such
unit, when used by an End User, is provided by Application(s) or otherwise
depends on the Licensed Software; or Applications designed for the hardware
devices specified in item (i). Devices covered by this Appendix shall be
specified in the Pricing Appendix or Purchase Document.

2.11. “Distribution License(s)” shall mean a royalty-bearing license required
for any kind of sale, trade, exchange, loan, lease, rental or other distribution
by or on behalf of Customer to a third party of Redistributables in connection
with Devices pursuant to license grant described in Section 5.3 of this
Appendix. Distribution Licenses are sold separately for each type of Device
respectively and cannot be used for any other type of Devices. 

2.12. “Distribution License Packs” shall mean set of prepaid Distribution
Licenses for distribution of Redistributables, as defined in The Qt Company’s
standard price list, quote, Pricing Appendix or in the Purchase Document, as
applicable.  

2.13. “Evaluation License Term” shall mean a time period specified in the
License Certificate for the Customer to use the relevant Licensed Software for
evaluation purposes according to Section 5.5 of this Appendix.

2.14. “Intellectual Property Rights” shall mean patents (including utility
models), design patents, and designs (whether or not capable of registration),
chip topography rights and other like protection, copyrights, trademarks,
service marks, trade names, logos or other words or symbols and any other form
of statutory protection of any kind and applications for any of the foregoing as
well as any trade secrets. 

2.15. “License Certificate” shall mean a certificate generated by The Qt Company
for each Designated User respectively upon their download of the Licensed
Software, which will be available under the respective Designated User’s Qt
Account at account.qt.io. License Certificates will specify relevant information
pertaining to the Licensed Software purchased by Customer and the license to the
Licensed Software. 

2.16. “License Fee” shall mean the fee charged to Customer for rights granted
under this Appendix.  

2.17. “Licensed Software” shall mean the specified product(s) of Qt Software
which Customer has purchased and which is provided to Customer under the terms
of this Appendix (including its Exhibits). Licensed Software shall include
corresponding online or electronic documentation, associated media and printed
materials, including source code (where applicable), example programs and the
documentation. Licensed Software does not include Third Party Software (as
defined in Section 6) or Qt Community Edition. The Qt Company may, in the course
of its development activities, at its free and absolute discretion and without
any obligation to send or publish any notifications to Customer or in general,
make changes, additions or deletions in the components and functionalities of
the Licensed Software, provided that no such changes, additions or deletions
will affect the already released version of the Licensed Software, but only
upcoming version(s).  

2.18. “License Term” shall mean the agreed validity period of the Development
License during which the relevant Licensed Software product can be used pursuant
to this Appendix. The agreed License Term, as ordered and paid for by Customer,
shall be memorialized in the applicable License Certificate. 

2.19. “Customer’s Records” shall mean books and records that contain information
bearing on Customer’s compliance with the Agreement, Customer’s use of Qt
Community Edition and/or the payments due to The Qt Company under the Agreement,
including, but not limited to user information, assembly logs, sales records and
distribution records. 

2.20. “Modified Software” shall have the meaning as set forth below in Section
4. 

2.21. “Qt Software” shall mean the development and design software of The Qt
Company, which The Qt Company makes available under commercial and/or open
source licenses as either the “Licensed Software” or the “Qt Community Edition”.

2.22. “Permitted Software” shall mean third party products that are generally
available to the public, which may include parts of Qt Community Edition or be
developed using Qt Community Edition. 

2.23. “Pre-Release Code” shall have the meaning as set forth in Section 7.

2.24. “Prohibited Combination” shall mean any effort to use, combine,
incorporate, link or integrate Licensed Software with any software created with
or incorporating Qt Community Edition, or use Licensed Software for creation of
any such software.

2.25. “Qt Community Edition” shall mean  the open source version of Qt Software
available under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License, version 2.1
or later (“LGPL”) or the GNU General Public License, version 2.0 or later
(“GPL”). For clarity, Qt Community Edition shall not be provided, governed or
used under this Appendix.

2.26. “Redistributables" shall mean the portions of Licensed Software as set
forth in Exhibit 1 hereto that may be distributed pursuant to this Appendix in
object code form only, including any relevant documentation. Where relevant, any
reference to Licensed Software in this Appendix includes and refers to
Redistributables.

2.27. “Renewal Term” shall mean an extension of the previous License Term as
agreed between the Parties.

2.28. “Submitted Modified Software” shall have the meaning as set forth in
Section 4.2 of this Appendix.

2.29. “Third-Party Software" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6 of
this Appendix.

2.30. “Updates” shall mean a release or version of the Licensed Software
containing bug fixes, error corrections and other changes that are generally
made available to users of the Licensed Software that have contracted for
Support. Updates are generally depicted as a change to the digits following the
decimal in the Licensed Software version number. The Qt Company shall make
Updates available to Customer under the Support. Updates shall be considered as
part of the Licensed Software hereunder.

2.31. “Upgrades” shall mean a release or version of the Licensed Software
containing enhancements and new features and are generally depicted as a change
to the first digit of the Licensed Software version number. In the event that
Upgrades are provided to Customer under this Appendix, they shall be considered
as part of the Licensed Software hereunder.

3. OWNERSHIP

3.1. Ownership of The Qt Company

3.1.1. The Licensed Software is protected by copyright laws and international
copyright treaties, as well as other intellectual property laws and treaties.
The Licensed Software is licensed, not sold.

3.1.2. All of The Qt Company's Intellectual Property Rights are and shall remain
the exclusive property of The Qt Company or its respective licensors . No rights
to The Qt Company’s Intellectual Property Rights are assigned or granted to
Customer under this Appendix, except when and to the extent expressly specified
herein.

3.2. Ownership of Customer

3.2.1. All of Customer’s Intellectual Property Rights are and shall remain the
exclusive property of Customer or its licensors respectively.

3.2.2. Except to the extent set forth in this Appendix, all Intellectual
Property Rights to the Modified Software, Applications and Devices (except to
Redistributables included therein) shall remain with Customer. 

4. MODIFIED SOFTWARE

4.1. Customer may create bug-fixes, error corrections, patches or modifications
to the Licensed Software (“Modified Software”). To the extent that Customer’s
Modified Software breaks source or binary compatibility or other functionality
with the Licensed Software, Customer acknowledges that The Qt Company’s ability
to provide Support may be prevented or limited and Customer’s ability to make
use of Updates may be restricted.

4.2. Customer may, at its sole and absolute discretion, choose to submit
Modified Software to The Qt Company (“Submitted Modified Software”) in
connection with Customer’s Support request, service request or otherwise. In the
event Customer does so, then, Customer hereby grants The Qt Company a
sublicensable, assignable, irrevocable, perpetual, worldwide, non-exclusive,
royalty-free and fully paid-up license, under all of Customer’s Intellectual
Property Rights, to reproduce, adapt, translate, modify, and prepare derivative
works of, publicly display, publicly perform, sublicense, make available and
distribute such Submitted Modified Software as The Qt Company sees fit at its
free and absolute discretion.

5. LICENSES GRANTED

5.1. Development with Licensed Software

5.1.1. Subject to the terms of the Agreement, The Qt Company grants to Customer
a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable license, valid for each License
Term, to use, modify and copy the Licensed Software by Designated Users on the
Development Platforms for the sole purposes of designing, developing,
demonstrating and testing Application(s) and/or Devices, and to provide support
and other services related to such Applications and Devices to End Customers.
Each Application and/or Device can only include, incorporate or integrate
contributions by such Designated Users who are duly licensed for the applicable
Development Platform(s) and Deployment Platform(s) (i.e have a valid license for
the appropriate Licensed Software product and only use one type of Qt
Development License per Customer Application and/or Device(s)).

5.1.2. Customer may install copies of the Licensed Software on five (5)
computers per Designated User, provided that only Designated Users who have a
valid Development License may use the Licensed Software. 

5.1.3. Customer may designate another Designated User to replace a then-current
Designated User by notifying The Qt Company in writing, where such replacement
is due to termination of employment, long-term absence or other permanent reason
affecting Designated User’s need for Licensed Software.  

5.1.4. Upon expiry of the initially agreed License Term, the respective License
Term shall be automatically extended by one or more Renewal Term(s), unless and
until either Party notifies the other Party in writing, that it does not wish to
continue the License Term, such notification to be provided to the other Party
no less than thirty (30) days before expiry of the respective License Term. The
Qt Company shall, in good time before the due date for the above notification,
remind the Customer on the coming Renewal Term. Unless otherwise agreed between
the Parties, Renewal Term shall be equal to the length of the previous License
Term, but no longer than thirty-six (36) months.

5.1.5. Any such Renewal Term shall be subject to License Fees agreed between the
Parties or, if no advance agreement exists, subject to The Qt Company’s standard
list pricing applicable at the commencement date of any such Renewal Term.

5.2. Distribution of Applications 

5.2.1. Subject to the terms of the Agreement, The Qt Company grants to Customer
a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable, perpetual, royalty-free and
revocable (only for Customer’s material breach of agreement) right and license
to:

distribute, by itself or through its Contractors, Redistributables as installed,
incorporated or integrated into Applications for execution on the Deployment
Platforms; and grant perpetual and irrevocable sublicenses to Redistributables,
as distributed hereunder, for End Customers solely to the extent necessary in
order for the End Customers to use the Applications for their respective
intended purposes. 5.2.2. Right to distribute the Redistributables as part of an
Application as provided herein is not royalty-bearing but is conditional upon
the Application having been created, updated and maintained under a valid and
duly paid Development License.

5.3. Distribution of Devices 

5.3.1. Subject to the terms of the Agreement, The Qt Company grants to Customer
a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable, perpetual, revocable (only for
Customer’s material breach of agreement), royalty-bearing right and license to:

distribute, by itself or through one or more tiers of Contractors,
Redistributables as installed, incorporated or integrated, or intended to be
installed, incorporated or integrated into Devices for execution on the
Deployment Platforms; and grant perpetual and irrevocable sublicenses to
Redistributables, as distributed hereunder, for End Customers solely to the
extent necessary in order for the End Customers to use the Devices for their
respective intended purposes. 5.3.2. Right to distribute the Devices as provided
herein is conditional upon (i) the Devices having been created, updated and
maintained under a valid and duly paid Development License, and (ii) Customer
having acquired corresponding Distribution Licenses at the time of distribution
of any Devices to End Customers. 

5.4. Further Requirements

5.4.1. The licenses granted in this Section 5 by The Qt Company to Customer are
conditional and subject to Customer's compliance with the following terms:

Customer acknowledges that The Qt Company has separate products for the purpose
of Applications and Devices respectively, where development and distribution of
Devices is only allowed using the correct designated product. Customer shall
ensure and bear the burden of proof that Customer is using a correct product
entitling Customer to development and distribution of Devices;  
Customer shall not remove or alter any copyright, trademark or other proprietary
rights notice(s) contained in any portion of the Licensed Software;  
Applications must add primary and substantial functionality to Licensed Software
so as not to compete with the Licensed Software; Applications may not pass on
functionality which in any way makes it possible for others to create software
with Licensed Software; provided however that Customer may use Licensed
Software’s scripting and QML ("Qt Quick") functionality solely in order to
enable scripting, themes and styles that augment the functionality and
appearance of the Application(s) without adding primary and substantial
functionality to the Application(s); Customer shall not use Licensed Software in
any manner or for any purpose that infringes, misappropriates or otherwise
violates any Intellectual Property Right or right of any third party, or that
violates any applicable law; Customer shall not use The Qt Company's or any of
its suppliers' names, logos, or trademarks to market Applications, except that
Customer may use “Built with Qt” logo to indicate that an Application or Device
was developed using Licensed Software;   
Customer shall not distribute, sublicense or disclose source code of Licensed
Software to any third party (provided however that Customer may appoint
employee(s) of Contractors and Affiliates as Designated Users to use Licensed
Software pursuant to this Appendix). Customer shall not grant the End Customers
a right to: (a) make copies of the Redistributables except when and to the
extent required to use the Applications and/or Devices for their intended
purpose; (b) modify the Redistributables or create derivative works thereof; (c)
decompile, disassemble or otherwise reverse engineer Redistributables; or (d)
redistribute any copy or portion of the Redistributables to any third party,
except as part of the onward sale of the Application or Device on which the
Redistributables are installed; Customer shall not, and shall cause that its
Affiliates or Contractors shall not, use Licensed Software in any Prohibited
Combination, unless Customer has received specific advance written permission
from The Qt Company to do so. Absent such written permission, any and all
distribution by Customer during the term of the Agreement of a hardware device
or product: a) which incorporates or integrates any part of Licensed Software or
Qt Community Edition; or b) where substantial functionality is provided by
software built with Licensed Software or Qt Community Edition or otherwise
depends on Licensed Software or Qt Community Edition, shall be considered to be
Device distribution under this Appendix and shall be dependent on Customer’s
compliance thereof (including but not limited to the obligation to pay
applicable License Fees for such distribution). Notwithstanding the foregoing,
Customer is entitled to use and combine Licensed Software with Permitted
Software; Customer shall cause all of its Affiliates, Contractors and End
Customer entitled to make use of the licenses granted under this Appendix, to be
contractually bound to comply with the relevant terms hereof and not to use the
Licensed Software beyond the terms hereof nor for any purposes other than
operating within the scope of their services for Customer. Customer shall be
responsible for any and all actions and omissions of its Affiliates,
Contractors, and End Customers relating to the Licensed Software and use thereof
(including but not limited to payment of all applicable License Fees); Except
when and to the extent explicitly provided in this Section 5, Customer shall not
transfer, publish, disclose, display or otherwise make available the Licensed
Software; and Customer shall not attempt or enlist a third party to conduct or
attempt to conduct any of the above. 5.4.2. The above terms shall not be
applicable if and solely to the extent they conflict with any mandatory
provisions of applicable laws.

5.4.3. Any use of Licensed Software beyond the provisions of this Appendix is
strictly prohibited and requires, at a minimum an additional license from The Qt
Company (e.g. certain additional rights granted under software development kit
“SDK” agreement with regard to limitations of Section 5.4.1 iv, vii or viii).

5.5. Evaluation License

5.5.1. Subject to the terms of this Appendix, The Qt Company grants to Customer
a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable license, valid for the Evaluation
License Term to use the relevant Licensed Software product solely for Customer’s
internal use to evaluate and determine whether the Licensed Software meets
Customer's business requirements, specifically excluding any commercial use of
the Licensed Software or any derived work thereof. 

5.5.2. Upon the expiry of the Evaluation License Term, Customer must either
discontinue use of the relevant Licensed Software or acquire a commercial
Development License specified herein.

6. THIRD-PARTY SOFTWARE. The Licensed Software may provide links or access to
third party libraries or code (collectively "Third-Party Software") to implement
various functions. Third-Party Software does not, however, comprise part of the
Licensed Software, but is provided to Customer complimentary and use thereof is
discretionary for Customer. Third-Party Software will be listed in the
".../src/3rdparty" source tree delivered with the Licensed Software or
documented in the Licensed Software, as such may be amended from time to time.
Customer acknowledges that use or distribution of Third-Party Software is in all
respects subject to applicable license terms of applicable third-party right
holders.

7. PRE-RELEASE CODE

7.1. The Licensed Software may contain pre-release code and functionality, or
sample code marked or otherwise stated with appropriate designation such as
“Technology Preview”, “Alpha”, “Beta”, “Experimental”, “Sample”, “Example” etc.
(“Pre-Release Code”). 

7.2. Such Pre-Release Code may be provided complimentary for  Customer, in order
to provide experimental support or information for new platforms or preliminary
versions of one or more new functionalities, or for other similar reasons.
Pre-Release Code may not be at the level of performance and compatibility of a
final, generally available, product offering.  Pre-Release Code may not operate
correctly, may contain errors and may be substantially modified by The Qt
Company prior to a commercial product release, if any. The Qt Company is under
no obligation to make Pre-Release Code commercially available, or provide any
Support or Updates relating thereto. To the maximum extent permitted by law, the
Qt Company assumes no liability whatsoever regarding any Pre-Release Code and
any use thereof is exclusively at Customer’s own risk and expense.

7.3.  Unless Licensed Software specifies different license terms for the
respective Pre-Release Code, Customer is entitled to use such pre-release code
pursuant to Section 5 of this Appendix, just like other Licensed Software.

8. SUPPORT. Support is provided according to agreed support level and subject to
applicable requirements and restrictions, as specified in the Appendix for
Support Terms.

9. FEES AND ORDERING: DISTRIBUTION LICENSES

9.1. Distribution License Packs

9.1.1. Unless otherwise agreed in writing, Distribution Licenses shall be
purchased by way of Distribution License Packs.

9.1.2. Upon due payment of the ordered Distribution License Pack(s), Customer
will have an account of Distribution Licenses available for distributing the
Redistributables in accordance with this Agreement.

9.2. Each time Customer distributes a copy of Redistributables, one Distribution
License is used and Customer’s account of available Distribution Licenses is
decreased accordingly.

9.3. Customer may distribute copies of the Redistributables so long as Customer
has Distribution Licenses remaining on its account. 

10. RECORD-KEEPING AND REPORTING OBLIGATIONS; AUDIT RIGHTS

10.1. Customer’s Record-keeping

10.1.1. Customer shall at all times during the term of the Agreement or validity
of any of the licenses hereunder, whichever is later, and for a period of two
(2) years thereafter, maintain Customer’s Records in an accurate and up-to-date
form. Customer’s Records shall be adequate to reasonably enable The Qt Company
to determine Customer’s compliance with the provisions of the Agreement. The
records shall conform to general good accounting practices.  

10.1.2. Customer shall, within thirty (30) days from receiving The Qt Company’s
request to that effect, deliver to The Qt Company a report based on Customer’s
Records, such report to contain information, in sufficient detail, on: (i)
number and identity of users working with Licensed Software or Qt Community
Edition, (ii) copies of Redistributables distributed by Customer during the most
recent calendar quarter and/or any other term specified by The Qt Company, and
(iii) any other information pertaining to Customer’s compliance with the terms
of the Agreement (e.g. information on products and/or projects relating to use
of Distribution Licenses), as The Qt Company may reasonably require from time to
time.

10.2. The Qt Company’s Audit Rights

10.2.1. The Qt Company or an independent auditor acting on behalf of The Qt
Company may, upon at least thirty (30) days’ prior written notice and at The Qt
Company expense, audit Customer with respect to Customer’s use of the Licensed
Software, but not more frequently than once during each six (6) month period.
Such audit may be conducted by mail, electronic means or through an in-person
visit to Customer’s place of business. Any possible in-person audit shall be
conducted during regular business hours at Customer's facilities, shall not
unreasonably interfere with Customer's business activities and shall be limited
in scope to verify Customer’s compliance with the terms of the Agreement. The Qt
Company or its independent auditor shall be entitled to inspect Customer’s
Records and conduct necessary interviews of Customer’s relevant employees and
Contractors. All Customer’s Records and use thereof shall be subject to the
obligation of confidentiality under the Agreement. 

10.2.2. If an audit reveals that Customer is using the Licensed Software beyond
scope of the licenses Customer has paid for, Customer shall pay to The Qt
Company any amounts owed for such unauthorized use within thirty (30) days from
receipt of the corresponding invoice from The Qt Company.  
10.2.3. In addition, in the event the audit reveals a material violation of the
terms of the Agreement (without limitation, either (i) underpayment of more than
10% of License Fees or 10,000 euros (whichever is more) or (ii) distribution of
products, which include or result from Prohibited Combination, shall be deemed a
material violation for purposes of this section), then Customer shall pay The Qt
Company's reasonable cost of conducting such audit. 

11. TERMINATION

11.1. Termination of Licenses

11.1.1. The Qt Company may terminate Customer’s rights to any and all Licensed
Software (including access to Support), if Customer:

commits a material breach of the Agreement (including this Appendix) and has not
remedied the breach within a reasonable period of time (which shall be no less
than 30 days) of The Qt Company’s written notice specifying the breach, or
becomes bankrupt, insolvent or goes into liquidation or debt restructuring.
11.2. Suspension of rights: Instead of termination, The Qt Company reserves the
right to suspend or withhold grants of any and all rights to the Licensed
Software (including Support), should Customer fail to make payment in timely
fashion or otherwise violate or is reasonably suspected of violating its
obligations under the Agreement and/or this Appendix, and where such violation
or breach is not cured within ten (10) business days following The Qt Company’s
written notice thereof. 

11.3. Parties´ Rights and Duties upon Termination

11.3.1. Upon expiry or termination of the Development Licenses, Customer shall
cease and shall cause all Designated Users (including those of its Affiliates’
and Contractors’) to cease using the relevant Licensed Software.

11.3.2. Upon such expiry or termination of Development Licenses, Customer shall
destroy or return to The Qt Company all copies of the respective Licensed
Software and all related materials and will certify the same by Customer’s duly
authorized officer to The Qt Company upon its request, provided however that
Customer may retain and utilize such copies of the Licensed Software to the
extent required to provide Customer’s continued support to End Customers,  for
archiving purposes or as is required under applicable law.

11.3.3. Distribution Licenses are perpetual and, therefore, Customer’s
distribution rights hereunder shall only terminate upon The Qt Company’s
termination of Distribution Licenses due to Customer’s material breach as set
forth in Section 11.1.1(i) of this Appendix. In case of such termination by The
Qt Company due to Customer’s material breach, Customer must cease any
distribution of Applications and Devices at the effective date of termination.

11.3.4. Expiry or termination of any of Customer’s licenses hereunder for any
reason whatsoever shall not: 

relieve Customer of its obligation to pay any License Fees accrued or payable to
The Qt Company prior to the effective date of termination, and Customer pay to
The Qt Company all such fees within 30 days from the effective date of
termination of the licenses; relieve Customer of its obligation to ensure that
Applications and Devices (including those already distributed) remain in
compliance with the terms of the Agreement; nor affect any rights of End
Customer to continue use of Applications and Devices (and therein incorporated
Redistributables). 11.4. Extension of Rights under Special Circumstances. In the
event that, during the applicable License Term, The Qt Company is declared
bankrupt under a final, non-cancellable decision by relevant court of law, and
the Agreement is not, at the date of expiry of the Development License(s),
assigned to a party who has assumed The Qt Company’s position as a legitimate
licensor of Licensed Software under the Agreement, then all valid Development
Licenses possessed by Customer at such date of expiry, and which Customer has
not notified for expiry, shall be extended to be valid in perpetuity under the
terms of the Agreement. Any such extension shall not apply to The Qt Company’s
Support obligations.

Appendix for Squish, Coco, and Test Center Version 2024-02, compliant with Qt
Frame Agreement 2023-06 or later, or as an amendment for Qt License Agreement
4.0, 4.1 and 4.3.

1. This Appendix for Squish, Coco, and Test Center (“Appendix”) is an integral
part of the Agreement and specifies the terms and conditions for the licensing
of Squish, Coco, and Test Center tools between The Qt Company and Customer. Any
capitalized words not defined herein are as defined in the Agreement. Entry into
this Appendix governs the use of and supersedes any prior contracts between the
Parties (including prior License Agreements and similar prior agreements) with
respect to the Squish, Coco, and Test Center tools.

2. DEFINITIONS

2.1. “Customer’s Records” shall mean books and records that contain information
bearing on Customer’s compliance with the Agreement and this Appendix,
including, but not limited to user information and assembly logs. 

2.2. “Designated User(s)” shall mean the employee(s) of Customer or Customer’s
Affiliates acting within the scope of their employment or Customer’s Contractors
acting within the scope of their services on behalf of Customer. 

2.3. “End Customers” shall mean the customers of Customer to whom Customer
directly or indirectly distributes copies of the Redistributables as part of
Customer’s product. 

2.4. “Evaluation License Term” shall mean a time period specified in the License
Certificate for Customer to use the relevant Licensed Software for evaluation
purposes according to Section 3.3 of this Appendix.

2.5. “License Certificate” shall mean a certificate generated by The Qt Company
for each Designated User respectively upon them downloading the Licensed
Software, which will be available under respective Designated User’s Qt Account
at account.qt.io. License Certificates will specify relevant information,
including license information, pertaining the Licensed Software purchased by
Customer. 

2.6. “License Fee” shall mean the fee charged to Customer for rights granted
under this Appendix.  

2.7. ”License Term” shall mean the agreed validity period of the Tools license
during which time Customer may use the Tools pursuant to this Appendix. Agreed
License Term, as ordered and paid for by  Customer, shall be memorialized in the
applicable License Certificate. 

2.8. “Online Services” shall mean any services or access to systems made
available by The Qt Company to Customer over the internet relating to the
Licensed Software or for the purpose of use by  Customer of the Licensed
Software or Support. Use of any such Online Services is discretionary for
Customer and may be subject to additional fees.

2.9. "Tools” or “Licensed Software” shall mean software libraries and tools as
defined in Exhibit 1 hereto depending on which product(s) Customer has purchased
under the applicable Purchase Document.  

2.10. “Redistributables” shall mean Squish Hook, Qt Wrapper, startaut, and
squishserver modules of Licensed Software.

2.11. “Renewal Term” shall mean an extension of previous License Term as agreed
between the Parties.

2.12. “Updates” shall mean a release or version of the Licensed Software
containing bug fixes, error corrections and other changes that are generally
made available to users of the Licensed Software that have contracted for
Support. Updates are generally depicted as a change to the digits following the
decimal in the Licensed Software version number. The Qt Company shall make
Updates available to Customer under Support and Updates are considered as part
of the Licensed Software hereunder.

2.13. “Upgrades” shall mean a release or version of the Licensed Software
containing enhancements and new features. Upgrades are generally depicted as a
change to the first digit of the Licensed Software version number. In the event
Upgrades are provided to Customer under this Appendix, they shall be considered
as part of the Licensed Software hereunder.

3. LICENSES GRANTED

3.1. Tools License

3.1.1. Subject to the terms of this Appendix and the Agreement, The Qt Company
grants to Customer a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable license, valid
for the License Term, to use and modify the Tools for Customer's internal
business purposes in accordance with the License capabilities and install and
use capabilities in Exhibit 1 to this Appendix—as ordered by Customer. 

3.1.2. If Customer’s license under this Appendix includes Redistributables, then
Customer is entitled to distribute, for the life cycle of the Customer’s
product, compiled binary versions of Redistributables to End Customers as part
of Customer’s product. 

3.1.3. Customer may use Tools source code solely to (i) compile Tools against
modifications Customer has made to The Qt Company’s Qt Software products, (ii)
create a static build with Redistributables for Customer’s product, or (iii)
build squishrunner for Python 3.9 programming language (or, upon separate
written approval from The Qt Company, other supported programming languages),
and not for any other purposes. Customer may not, by any method, manner or means
alter, amend, or modify Tools source code. If Customer’s license includes the
use of cross-compilation add-ons, then Customer may use the source code of
Redistributables of such cross compilation add-on’s solely for enabling embedded
development and on-device testing, but the Customer may not, by any method,
manner or means alter, amend, or modify such software source code.

3.1.4. Upon expiration of the initial agreed License Term, the License Term
shall be automatically extended to one or more Renewal Term(s), unless and until
either Party notifies the other Party in writing that it does not wish to renew
the License Term, such notification to be provided to the other Party no less
than thirty (30) days before expiration of the respective License Term. The Qt
Company shall, in good time before the due date for the above notification,
remind Customer on the coming Renewal Term. Unless otherwise agreed between the
Parties, the Renewal Term shall be equal to the length of the previous previous
License Term, but no longer than thirty-six (36) months.  

3.1.5. Any Renewal Term shall be subject to License Fees agreed between the
Parties or, if no such agreement exists, The Qt Company’s standard list pricing
applicable at the commencement date of any such Renewal Term.

3.2. Further Requirements

3.2.1. The licenses granted in this Section 3 by The Qt Company to Customer are
conditional on and subject to Customer's compliance with the following terms:

Customer shall not remove or alter any copyright, trademark or other proprietary
rights notice(s) contained in any portion of the Licensed Software;  
Customer shall not use Licensed Software in any manner or for any purpose that
infringes, misappropriates or otherwise violates any Intellectual property or
right of any third party, or that violates any applicable law; Customer shall
not use The Qt Company's or any of its suppliers' names, logos, or trademarks to
market its products except that Customer may use “Built with Qt” logo to
indicate that Customer’s product was developed using the Licensed Software;   
Except for Redistributables, which may be distributed as part of Customer’s
hardware product, Customer shall not distribute, transfer, publish, disclose,
display or otherwise make the Licensed Software available in any part,
separately or as part of any software package, to any third party; and Customer
shall not attempt or enlist a third party to conduct or attempt to conduct any
of the above. Above terms shall not be applicable if and to the extent they
conflict with any mandatory provisions of any applicable laws.

3.2.2. Any use of Licensed Software beyond the provisions of this Appendix is
strictly prohibited and, at a minimum, requires an additional license from The
Qt Company.

3.3. Evaluation License

3.3.1. Subject to the terms of this Appendix, The Qt Company grants to Customer
a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable license, valid for the Evaluation
License Term to use the relevant Licensed Software product solely for the
Customer’s internal use to evaluate and determine whether the Licensed Software
meets Customer's business requirements, specifically excluding any commercial
use of the Licensed Software or any derived work thereof. 

3.3.2. Upon the expiry of the Evaluation License Term, Customer must either
discontinue use of the relevant Licensed Software or acquire a commercial Tools
License in accordance with this Appendix. 

4. THIRD-PARTY SOFTWARE. The Licensed Software may provide links or access to
third party libraries or code (collectively "Third-Party Software") to implement
various functions. Third-Party Software does not, however, comprise part of the
Licensed Software, but is provided to Customer complimentary and use thereof is
discretionary for the Customer. Third-Party Software will be listed in the
Licensed Software documentation, as such may be amended from time to time.
Customer acknowledges that use of Third-Party Software is in all respects
subject to applicable license terms of applicable third-party right holders.

5. PRE-RELEASE SOFTWARE 

5.1. The Licensed Software may contain pre-release functionality, or sample test
cases marked or otherwise stated with an appropriate designation such as
“Technology Preview”, “Alpha”, “Beta”, “Sample”, “Experimental”, “Example” etc.
(“Pre-Release Code”). 

5.2. Such Pre-Release Software may be present complimentary for Customer, in
order to provide experimental support or information for new platforms or
preliminary versions of one or more new functionalities or for other similar
reasons. The Pre-Release Software may not be at the level of performance and
compatibility of a final generally available product offering.  The Pre-Release
Software may not operate correctly, may contain errors and may be substantially
modified by The Qt Company prior to a commercial product release (if any). The
Qt Company is under no obligation to make Pre-Release Software commercially
available, or provide any Support or Updates relating thereto. To the maximum
extent permitted by law, the Qt Company assumes no liability whatsoever
regarding any Pre-Release Software, but any use thereof is exclusively at
Customer’s own risk and expense.

5.3. For clarity, unless Licensed Software specifies different license terms for
the respective Pre-Release Software, Customer is entitled to use such
pre-release software pursuant to Section 3 of this Appendix.

6. SUPPORT, UPDATES AND ONLINE SERVICES 

6.1. Upon due payment of the applicable License Fees, Customer will be eligible
to receive Support and Updates and to use applicable Online Services during the
agreed License Term or other agreed fixed time period. Support is provided
according to agreed support levels and the Appendix for Support Terms. Unless
otherwise decided by The Qt Company at its free and absolute discretion,
Upgrades will not be included in the Support but may be available subject to
additional fees.

6.2. Unless otherwise agreed in writing, The Qt Company shall not be responsible
for providing any service or support to End Customers.

7. RECORD-KEEPING AND REPORTING OBLIGATIONS; AUDIT RIGHTS

7.1. Customer’s Record-Keeping

7.1.1. Customer shall at all times during the term of the Agreement or validity
of any of the licenses hereunder, whichever is later, and for a period of two
(2) years thereafter maintain Customer’s Records in an accurate and up-to-date
form. Customer’s Records shall be adequate to reasonably enable The Qt Company
to determine Customer’s compliance with the provisions of the Agreement. The
records shall conform to general good accounting practices.  

7.1.2. Customer shall, within thirty (30) days from receiving The Qt Company’s
request to that effect, deliver to The Qt Company a report based on Customer’s
Records, such report to contain information, in sufficient detail, on the
Customer’s use of Tools hereunder.

7.2. The Qt Company’s Audit Rights

7.2.1  The Qt Company or an independent auditor acting on behalf of The Qt
Company may, upon at least thirty (30) days’ prior written notice and at The Qt
Company’s expense, audit Customer with respect to Customer’s use of the Licensed
Software, but not more frequently than once during each six (6) month period.
Such audit may be conducted by mail, electronic means or through an in-person
visit to Customer’s place of business. Any possible in-person audit shall be
conducted during regular business hours at Customer's facilities, shall not
unreasonably interfere with Customer's business activities and shall be limited
in scope to verify Customer’s compliance with the terms of the Agreement. The Qt
Company or its independent auditor shall be entitled to inspect Customer’s
Records and conduct necessary interviews of Customer’s relevant employees and
Contractors. All Customer’s Records and use thereof shall be subject to the
obligation of confidentiality under the Agreement.  

7.2.2 If an audit reveals that Customer is using the Licensed Software beyond
scope of the licenses Customer has paid for, Customer shall pay to The Qt
Company any amounts owed for such unauthorized use within thirty (30) days from
receipt of the corresponding invoice from The Qt Company. 

7.2.3  In addition, in the event the audit reveals a material violation of the
terms of the Agreement (e.g., without limitation, underpayment of more than 10%
of License Fees or 10,000 Euros (whichever is more)), then Customer shall pay
The Qt Company's reasonable cost of conducting such audit. 

8. TERMINATION

8.1. Termination of Licenses. The Qt Company may terminate all Customer’s rights
to any and all Licensed Software (including access to Support), if the Customer:

commits a material breach of the terms of the Agreement and has not, if the
breach is capable of remedy, remedied the breach within a reasonable period of
time (which shall be no less than 30 days) of The Qt Company’s written notice
specifying the breach; or becomes bankrupt, insolvent or goes into liquidation
or debt restructuring. 8.2. Suspension of Rights. Instead of termination, The Qt
Company shall have the right to suspend or withhold grants of any and all rights
to the Licensed Software (including Support) hereunder, should Customer fail to
make payment in timely fashion or otherwise violates or is reasonably suspected
to violate its obligations or terms under the Agreement, and where such
violation or breach is not cured within ten (10) business days following The Qt
Company’s written notice thereof.

8.3. Parties´ Rights and Duties upon Termination

8.3.1. Upon expiration or termination of the Tools Licenses, Customer shall
cease and shall cause all Designated Users (including those of its Affiliates’
and Contractors’) to cease using the Tools. 

8.3.2. Upon such expiry or termination of Tools Licenses, the Customer shall
destroy or return to The Qt Company all copies of the respective Licensed
Software and all related materials and will certify the same by Customer’s duly
authorized officer to The Qt Company upon its request, provided however that
Customer may retain:

a copy for archiving purposes or as may be required under applicable law; the
right to distribute in Section 3.1.2, which shall survive the termination or
expiration of this Agreement and continue for the duration of the lifecycle of
the Customer product utilizing the Redistributables. 8.3.3. Expiry or
termination of any of Customer’s licenses hereunder for any reason whatsoever
shall not relieve Customer of its obligation to pay any License Fees accrued or
payable to The Qt Company under any existing or outstanding Purchase Document in
effect prior to the effective date of termination, and Customer will pay to The
Qt Company all such unpaid fees due through the end of the Purchase Document’s
term within thirty (30) days from the effective date of termination of the
licenses.

8.4. Extension of Rights under Special Circumstances. In the event The Qt
Company is declared bankrupt under a final, non-cancellable decision by relevant
court of law, and the Agreement is not, at the date of expiry of the Tools
Licenses, assigned to party, who has assumed The Qt Company’s position as a
legitimate licensor of Licensed Software under the Agreement, then all valid
Tools Licenses possessed by the Customer at such date of expiry, and which the
Customer has not notified for expiry, shall be extended to be valid in
perpetuity under the terms of the Agreement. For clarity, should the foregoing
occur, any such extension shall not apply to The Qt Company’s Support
obligations.

Appendix for Axivion Products Version 2024-10, compliant with Qt License
Agreement 4, Qt Frame Agreement 2023-06, or later

1. This Appendix for Axivion Products is an integral part of the Agreement and
specifies the legal terms for the licensing of Axivion Products between The Qt
Company and the Customer. Entry into this Appendix governs the use of and
supersedes any prior contracts between the Parties (including prior License
Agreements and similar prior agreements), with respect to the Axivion Products.

2. DEFINITIONS

2.1. Capitalized words used in this Appendix are as defined below or as set
forth in the Agreement. 

2.2. “Add-on Products” shall mean The Qt Company’s specific add-on software
products which are not licensed as part of The Qt Company’s standard product
offering, and are included into the scope of Licensed Software only if so
specifically agreed between the Parties.

2.3. “Axivion Products” or “Licensed Software” shall mean software libraries and
tools as defined in Exhibit 1 hereto and depending on which product(s) =Customer
has purchased under the Purchase Document. 

2.4. “Axivion Site” shall mean Customer’s project team, organization or other
corresponding unit specified in the Purchase Document for the Axivion Products. 

2.5. “Customer’s Records” shall mean books and records that contain information
related to Customer’s compliance with the Agreement and this Appendix for
Axivion Products, including, but not limited to Technical Team Member and
Axivion Site information. 

2.6.  “Evaluation License Term” shall mean a time period—specified in the
License Key —for Customer to use the relevant Axivion Products for evaluation
purposes according to Section 3.2 of this Appendix for Axivion Products.

2.7. “License Key” shall mean an electronic key generated by The Qt Company for
Customer in relation to the download of the Licensed Software. License Keys will
specify relevant information pertaining to the scope of the Licensed Software
subscription purchased by Customer (e.g., authorized Site designation and number
of authorized Technical Team Members). 

2.8. “License Fee” shall mean the fees charged to Customer for usage rights
granted under this Appendix for Axivion Products, as set forth in the relevant
Purchase Documents.  

2.9. ”License Term” shall mean the agreed validity period of the Axivion
Products license subscription during which Customer may use Axivion Products
pursuant to these terms. The agreed License Term, as ordered and paid for by
Customer, shall be memorialized in the applicable License Key. 

2.10. “Renewal Term” shall mean an extension or renewal of the previous License
Term as agreed between the Parties.

2.11. "Technical Team Members” or “TTM” shall mean software architects,
developers and quality engineers working in or for the Axivion Site and involved
in software projects that are analyzed using Axivion Products.

2.12. “Third-Party Software" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4 of
this Appendix for Axivion Products.

2.13. “Updates” shall mean a release or version of the Licensed Software
containing bug fixes, error corrections and other changes that are generally
made available to users of the Licensed Software that have contracted for
Support. Updates are generally depicted as a change to the digits following the
decimal in the Licensed Software version number. The Qt Company may make Updates
available to the Customer under the Support. Updates shall be considered as part
of the Licensed Software hereunder.

2.14. “Upgrades” shall mean a release or version of the Licensed Software
containing enhancements, maintenance and new features and are generally depicted
as a change to the first digit of the Licensed Software version number. In the
event that any Upgrades are provided to the Customer under the Frame Agreement,
they shall be considered as part of the Licensed Software hereunder.

3. LICENSES GRANTED

3.1. Axivion Products License

3.1.1. Subject to compliance with the Agreement, The Qt Company grants to
Customer a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable license, valid for the
License Term, to load, display, run, transfer and store Axivion Products for
operational purposes of the Axivion Site and with the maximum number of
permitted Technical Team Members, whereby Customer is permitted to install an
unlimited number of copies of the Axivion Products identified with the
respective electronic key of the Axivion Site (“Axivion Site License”). If the
number of Technical Team Members of a Axivion Site exceeds the maximum number
indicated on the confirmation of the Purchase Document, Customer shall be
obliged to pay The Qt Company fees commensurate with the additional usage.

3.1.2. Upon expiry of the initially agreed License Term, the respective License
Term shall be automatically extended to one or more Renewal Term(s), unless and
until either Party notifies the other Party in writing no less than thirty (30)
days before expiry of the respective License Term  that it does not wish to
continue the License Term. The Qt Company shall, in good time before the due
date for the above notification, remind Customer on the coming Renewal Term.
Unless otherwise agreed between the Parties, the Renewal Term shall be equal to
the length of the previous License Term, but no longer than thirty-six (36)
months. 

3.1.3. Any Renewal Term shall be subject to License Fees agreed between the
Parties or, if no advance agreement exists, subject to The Qt Company’s standard
list pricing applicable at the commencement date of any such Renewal Term. 

3.1.4. Except with the express written consent of The Qt Company,  Customer
shall not:

adjust, modify, decompile, or otherwise amend the Axivion Products; connect the
Axivion Products to other programs in a manner other than via the interfaces
provided within Axivion Products for this purpose; remove, circumvent, or modify
copy protection mechanisms, elements of the program serving a digital rights
management (DRM), security codes (if any) or features serving as identification
of the Axivion Products, including the electronic key; or remove information, as
contained in Axivion Products and program documentation, or remove or alter any
copyright, trademark or other proprietary rights notice(s) contained in any
portion of the Axivion Products; use Axivion Products in any manner or for any
purpose that infringes, misappropriates or otherwise violates any Intellectual
property or right of any third party, or that violates applicable law; use The
Qt Company's or any of its suppliers' names, logos, or trademarks to market
Customer’s products without written permission of The Qt Company; or distribute,
transfer, publish, disclose, display or otherwise make the Axivion Products
available in any part, separately or as part of any software package, to any
third party. 3.1.5. The Qt Company is entitled to control compliance with the
foregoing provisions through technical means and to use such technical means
(including but not limited to a program-lock) to ensure compliance with these
provisions. 

3.1.6. Solely to the extent that any of the above terms conflict with mandatory
applicable provisions of law, such conflicting terms shall not apply.

3.1.7. Any use of Licensed Software beyond the provisions of this Appendix for
Axivion Products is strictly prohibited and requires, at a minimum, an
additional license from The Qt Company.

3.2. Evaluation License

3.2.1. Subject to the terms of this Appendix for Axivion Products, the Qt
Company grants to Customer a worldwide, non-exclusive, non-transferable license,
valid for the Evaluation License Term to use the relevant Licensed Software
product solely for  Customer’s internal use to evaluate and determine whether
the Licensed Software meets Customer's business requirements, specifically
excluding any commercial use of the Licensed Software or any derivative work
thereof. 

3.2.2. Upon the expiry of the Evaluation License Term, Customer must either
discontinue use of the relevant Licensed Software or acquire a commercial
license for the relevant Licensed Software. 

4. THIRD-PARTY SOFTWARE. The Licensed Software may provide links or access to
third party libraries or code (collectively "Third-Party Software") to implement
various functions. Third-Party Software does not comprise part of the Licensed
Software. Third-Party Software will be listed and documented in the Axivion
Products documentation (e.g., the Axivion Products copyright guide) as such may
be amended from time to time. Customer acknowledges that use or distribution of
Third-Party Software is in all respects subject to the applicable license terms
of such third-party right holders.

5. PRE-RELEASE CODE

5.1. The Licensed Software may contain pre-release code and functionality, or
sample code marked or otherwise stated with appropriate designation such as
“Technology Preview”, “Alpha”, “Beta”, “Experimental”, “Sample”, “Example” etc.
(“Pre-Release Code”). 

5.2. Such Pre-Release Code may be made available to Customer on a complimentary
basis, in order to provide experimental support, information for new platforms,
preliminary versions of one or more new functionalities, or for other similar
reasons. The Pre-Release Code may not be at the level of performance and
compatibility of a final generally available product offering.  The Pre-Release
Code may not operate correctly, may contain errors and may be substantially
modified by The Qt Company prior to commercial product release, if any. The Qt
Company is under no obligation to make Pre-Release Code commercially available,
or provide any Support or Updates relating thereto. To the fullest extent
permitted by law, The Qt Company assumes no liability whatsoever regarding any
Pre-Release Code; any use thereof is exclusively at Customer’s own risk and
expense.

6. SUPPORT AND UPDATES 

6.1. Upon due payment of the applicable License Fees, Customer will be eligible
to receive Support and Updates during the License Term or other agreed fixed
time period. Support is provided according and subject to the applicable support
terms for Axivion Products in the Appendix for Support Terms.

6.2. Unless otherwise decided by The Qt Company at its free and absolute
discretion, Upgrades will not be included in the support but may be available
subject to additional fees.

6.3. Unless otherwise agreed by the Parties in writing, The Qt Company shall not
be responsible for providing any service or support to Customer’s customers.

7. RECORD-KEEPING AND REPORTING OBLIGATIONS; AUDIT RIGHTS

7.1. Customer’s Record-keeping

7.1.1. Customer shall at all times during the term of the Agreement or the
validity period of any of the licenses hereunder, whichever is later, and for an
additional period of two (2) years thereafter, maintain Customer’s Records in an
accurate and up-to-date form. Customer’s Records shall be adequate to reasonably
enable The Qt Company to determine Customer’s compliance with the provisions of
the Agreement (including this Appendix). The records shall conform to general
good accounting practices.  

7.1.2. Customer shall, within thirty (30) days from receiving The Qt Company’s
request to that effect, deliver to The Qt Company a report based on Customer’s
Records containing sufficiently detailed information on Customer’s use of
Axivion Products.

7.2. The Qt Company’s Audit Rights

7.2.1. The Qt Company, or an independent auditor acting on behalf of The Qt
Company, may, upon at least thirty (30) days’ prior written notice and at its
expense, audit Customer with respect to Customer’s use of the Licensed Software,
but no more frequently than once every six (6) months. Such audit may be
conducted by mail, electronic means or through an in-person visit to Customer’s
place of business. Any in-person audit shall be conducted during regular
business hours at Customer's facilities, shall not unreasonably interfere with
Customer's business activities, and shall be limited in scope to verification of
Customer’s compliance with the Agreement. The Qt Company or its independent
auditor shall be entitled to inspect Customer’s Records and conduct necessary
interviews of Customer’s relevant employees and Contractors. All such Customer’s
Records and use thereof shall be subject to the confidentiality obligations of
the Agreement. 

7.2.2. If an audit reveals that Customer is using the Licensed Software beyond
the scope of the agreed License grant, Customer shall pay to The Qt Company any
amounts owed for such unauthorized use within thirty (30) days from issuance of
the corresponding invoice from The Qt Company.  

7.2.3. In addition, in the event the audit reveals a material violation of the
terms of the Agreement (including this Appendix), (including but not limited to
underpayment of more than 10 % of License Fees or 10,000 euros, whichever is
more), then Customer shall pay The Qt Company's reasonable cost of conducting
the audit. 

8. TERMINATION

8.1. Termination of Licenses. The Qt Company may terminate all Customer’s rights
to any and all Licensed Software (including access to Support), if Customer:

commits a material breach of this Appendix for Axivion Products or the Frame
Agreement and has not remedied the breach within a reasonable period of time
(which shall be no less than 30 days) from The Qt Company’s written notice
specifying the breach; or becomes bankrupt, insolvent or enters liquidation or
debt restructuring. 8.2. Suspension of Rights. Instead of termination, The Qt
Company reserves the right to suspend or withhold grants of any and all rights
to the Licensed Software (including Support) hereunder, should Customer fail to
make payment in timely fashion, otherwise violates or is reasonably suspected of
violation of its obligations or terms under the Agreement, and where such
violation or breach is not cured within ten (10) business days following The Qt
Company’s written notice thereof.

8.3. Parties´ Rights and Duties upon Termination

8.3.1. Upon expiration or termination of the Axivion Products Licenses, Customer
shall cease and shall cause all Technical Team Members to cease using the
Axivion Products. 

8.3.2. Upon such expiry or termination of the Axivion Products Licenses,
Customer shall destroy or return to The Qt Company all copies of the Axivion
Products and all related materials, and will certify the same by Customer’s duly
authorized officer to The Qt Company upon its request, provided however that
Customer may retain and exploit such copies of the Axivion Products as it may
reasonably require for archiving purposes or as may be required under applicable
law.

8.3.3. Expiration or termination of any of Customer’s licenses hereunder for any
reason whatsoever shall not relieve Customer of its obligation to pay any
License Fees accrued or payable to The Qt Company under any existing or
outstanding Purchase Document in effect prior to the effective date of
termination, and Customer shall pay to The Qt Company all such unpaid fees due
through the end of the Purchase Document’s term within thirty (30) days from the
effective date of termination of the licenses.

Appendix for Qt Insight Version 2024-02, compliant with Qt Frame Agreement
2023-6 or later, as an amendment for Qt License Agreement 4

1. INTRODUCTION 

1.1. This Appendix for Qt Insight, including the Data Processing Addendum
attached hereto, is an integral part of the Agreement and specifies the legal
terms for the use of the Service (as defined herein) between The Qt Company and
the Customer. Entry into this Appendix governs the use of and supersedes any
prior contracts between the Parties (including prior License Agreements and
similar prior agreements), with respect to the Service under this Appendix. 

1.2. Customer’s use of the Service further requires that Customer download the
Qt Tracker Library (available at the Qt Customer Portal or Online Installer) and
consents to the terms and conditions for use of the Qt Insight Tracker Library
upon such download. The Qt Tracker Library is licensed on a commercial basis,
but can be used in accordance with a Qt Community Edition license when Customer
has purchased a Qt Insight subscription.

1.3. Qt Insight is a software service provided by The Qt Company for Customers
interested in collecting and analyzing end-user data from their products by
using Qt Tracker Library in combination with Qt Insight Cloud or Qt Insight
Private Cloud each as further defined below (collectively, the “Service”). 

2. DEFINITIONS

2.1. ”Application” shall mean software and/or hardware devices products created
by Customer that utilize the Tracker Library (as defined below).  

2.2. ”Contractor” shall mean third party consultants, distributors and
contractors performing services to Customer under applicable contractual
arrangement.

2.3. “Designated User(s)” shall mean the employee(s) of Customer or Customer’s
Affiliates acting within the scope of their employment or Customer's Contractors
using the Service and utilizing Support. 

2.4. “End User” shall mean the user of Customer’s Application that utilizes the
Service. 

2.5. “Events” shall mean all the End-User actions (e.g. views, clicks, screen
views or swipes) on an Application that are tracked and sent to Insight Cloud or
Insight Private Cloud.

2.6. “Events Data” shall mean all data pertaining to Events that is collected by
or via the Service on behalf of Customer.  

2.7. “Events Personal Data” shall have the definition set forth in the Data
Protection Addendum to this Appendix. 

2.8. “Insight Cloud” means a multi-tenant online analytics platform provided,
hosted, and maintained by The Qt Company. The Insight Cloud is used to collect,
store, analyze, and visualize Events Data transmitted by the Qt Tracker Library.   

2.9. “Insight Private Cloud” shall mean an Insight Cloud instance installed,
hosted, and maintained by Customer in their selected cloud environment. The
Insight Private Cloud is used to collect, store, analyze, and visualize Events
Data transmitted by the Qt Tracker Library. 

2.10. “Intellectual Property Rights” shall mean patents (including utility
models), design patents, and designs (whether capable of registration or not),
chip topography rights and other protections, trade secrets, copyrights,
trademarks, service marks, trade names, logos or other proprietary words or
symbols, protected under law or statute. 

2.11. “Tracker Library” shall mean The Qt Company’s software module used to
collect Events Data from an Application and send such data either to Insight
Cloud or Insight Private Cloud.

2.12. “Retention” shall mean the period of time that the Events Data is stored
within the Insight Cloud or Insight Private Cloud, in accordance with the
Purchase Document and this Appendix.

3. OWNERSHIP AND USE RIGHTS

3.1. Ownership of The Qt Company. The Service is protected by copyright laws and
international copyright treaties, as well as other intellectual property laws
and treaties. As between the parties and except as expressly set forth in this
Agreement, The Qt Company reserves all rights, title, and interest in and to the
Service. All of The Qt Company's Intellectual Property Rights are and shall
remain the exclusive property of The Qt Company or its licensors respectively.
No rights to The Qt Company’s Intellectual Property Rights are assigned or
granted to Customer under this Appendix, except when and solely to the extent
expressly specified herein. 

3.2. Ownership of Customer. All of Customer’s Intellectual Property Rights are
and shall remain the exclusive property of Customer or its licensors
respectively. As between the parties and in relation to this Appendix and the
Services provided, Customer is the owner of Events Data.  Customer grants The Qt
Company a non-exclusive and worldwide license to the Events Data for the
purposes of providing and improving the Services (however no improvements may be
based on the use of Events Personal Data) in accordance with the uses set forth
in Section 4 below.  

3.3. Use of Qt Insight Cloud

3.3.1. Where Customer utilizes the Insight Cloud, The Qt Company will provide
access to the Insight Cloud to Customer for the purposes of utilizing the
Service for the duration of the agreed-upon ordering term by Designated Users.
Customer is provided access to and use of the Insight Cloud on a limited,
non-exclusive, non-transferable basis, subject to compliance with the terms of
this Appendix.   

3.3.2.  Customer agrees that, from time to time, the Insight Cloud may be
unavailable or inoperable due to: (i) maintenance, or repair procedures; (ii)
interruption or failure of electrical power, telecommunications, computers,
hardware, software, databases, networks, or infrastructures; (iii) hostile
network attacks; (iv) an event of force majeure; or (v) excessive Events Data
loads.  

3.3.3.  The Qt Company reserves the right to change the technical specifications
and the underlying production environment of the Insight Cloud without prior
notice to Customer. The Qt Company will notify Customer in advance if the change
has any material effects on Customer’s use of the Service. 

3.3.4.  Upon payment of the agreed Service Fees, Customer will be eligible to
receive Support for the Services during the applicable Subscription Term (as
defined below) and will receive updates for the Insight Cloud during the agreed
Subscription Term. Support is provided in accordance with the Appendix for
Support Terms. From time to time The Qt Company may change the support terms,
provided that during the applicable ongoing Support period, the level of Support
may not be materially reduced or altered without the consent of Customer. 

3.4.  Use of Insight Private Cloud

3.4.1. Where Customer utilizes the Insight Private Cloud, The Qt Company will
provide Customer with an instance of the Insight Private Cloud for the purposes
of Customer utilizing the Service via Designated Users. Provision of the Insight
Private Cloud is on a limited (for the duration of the agreed-upon ordering
term), non-exclusive, non-transferable basis, subject to compliance with the
terms of the Agreement. Customer may install an Insight Cloud instance to a
cloud platform of Customer’s choice from The Qt Company’s list of supported
cloud platforms. Insight Private Cloud features may not be identical to features
of the Insight Cloud.  

3.4.2. Upon payment of the agreed Service Fees, Customer will be eligible to
receive Support and updates for the Insight Private Cloud and Services during
the agreed Subscription Term. Support is provided as specified in the Appendix
for Support Terms.  

3.4.3. The Qt Company will provide its generally available updates and patches
for Insight Private Cloud. However, Customer is responsible for: (i) all
maintenance, including installing the updates and patches; (ii) the security of
the environment where the Insight Private Cloud is operated, as well as all the
costs related to operation and maintenance thereof; and (iii) that the
connectivity of the Insight Private Cloud to applicable Applications. Customer
acknowledges that Customer is responsible for the availability of the Insight
Private Cloud.  In the event of Customer’s failure to timely maintain the
Insight Private Cloud or install provided updates and patches, The Qt Company
does not warrant or support the Insight Private Cloud and, to the maximum extent
permitted by law, disclaims any warranties or liabilities arising in connection
with Customer’s failure to timely install updates and patches.

4. PERSONAL DATA AND DATA PROTECTION

4.1. Each party shall comply with its respective obligations under applicable
data protection laws, including but not limited to the General Data Protection
Regulation (EU 2016/679) (“GDPR”) and California privacy laws including the
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and the California Privacy Rights Act
(“CCPA”). 

4.2. The Service can be used by the Parties to process End User data collected
and stored in the Insight Cloud in order to analyze how End Users are using the
Applications. The Qt Company collects and processes Events Data for: (i)
securing, developing and improving the Service; (ii) providing the Service in
accordance with the Agreement; (iii) compiling anonymous statistics for research
and development, and marketing purposes, provided such statistics do not
directly or indirectly identify Customer, Designated Users, or any End Users;
(iv) invoicing purposes; and (v) problem and fault solving purposes. 

4.3. The Service can be used to process a limited set of personal data.
Accordingly, the Data Processing Addendum (“DPA”) attached to this Appendix
applies where the processing of personal data occurs.

4.4. The Parties shall maintain an appropriate level of physical, electronic,
and administrative security to protect the collected data, and prevent its
accidental, or unlawful destruction, or its loss, alteration, or unauthorized
disclosure, or access.  

4.5. The Qt Company has no access to data handling where Customer uses the
Insight Private Cloud. 

4.6. Customer acknowledges and agrees that the infrastructure used by The Qt
Company to host the Insight Cloud may be provided by a third-party hosting
provider, such as Amazon Web Services, Inc.  

5. CUSTOMER OBLIGATIONS

5.1. Customer shall be responsible for: 

 acquiring and maintaining the functional status of the hardware, connections
and software that Customer needs to use the Service; the protection of
Customer’s data systems and telecommunication and costs related to use of the
Service; preparing the hardware, connections, software and data systems to meet
the operating environment specifications delivered by The Qt Company; ensuring
that Customer (including its Contractors, Affiliates, and employees) does not
use or attempt to use the Service for the purpose of viewing personal data other
than as permitted under this Appendix, or any form of collection or processing
of sensitive personal data, each as defined by applicable data protection laws;
all activities of Customer and End Users in using the Service and or
Applications that may impact the Service, including use in compliance with the
Agreement; all necessary and applicable notices, consents, and disclosures
required to utilize the Service for Applications. 5.2. Customer shall not impose
an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on the Insight Cloud
infrastructure (“excessive load”). Otherwise, Service may be suspended by The Qt
Company. 

5.3. Customer shall not nor attempt to, and will not permit or assist any other
entity to or attempt to:  

breach, disable, tamper with, or develop or use (or attempt) any workaround for
any security measure provided by the Insight Cloud and Insight Private Cloud;  
use the Insight Cloud or any part thereof in any manner other than as permitted
herein;  
use the Insight Cloud or Insight Private Cloud in a way that infringes or
misappropriates a third party’s intellectual property rights or personal rights;  
send or store material on the Service containing software viruses, worms, Trojan
horses or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents or programs;
attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or related systems or
networks;  
engage in any promotional or marketing activities that are deceptive,
misleading, obscene, defamatory or illegal;  
use any device, software or routine to interfere or attempt to interfere with
the proper working of the Services or any activities conducted on The Qt
Company’s servers;  
alter or tamper with any information or materials on or associated with the
Service;  
provide access or login information to any 3rd party vendor or non-employee of
Customer without the written permission of The Qt Company; or  
resell, copy, rent, or otherwise distribute the Service (in whole or in part) to
third parties. 6. PRE-RELEASE FUNCTIONALITY

6.1. The Service may contain additional pre-release functionality marked or
otherwise stated with appropriate designation such as “Technology Preview”,
“Alpha”, “Beta”, “Sample”, “Example” etc. (“Pre-Release Functionality”).  

6.2. Such Pre-Release Functionality may be made available on a complimentary
basis to Customer, in order to provide experimental support or information for
new platforms, preliminary versions of one or more new functionalities, or for
other similar reasons. The Pre-Release Functionality may not be at the level of
performance and compatibility of a final, generally available, product offering.
The Pre-Release Functionality may not operate correctly, may contain errors and
may be substantially modified by The Qt Company prior to a first commercial
product release, if any. The Qt Company is under no obligation to make
Pre-Release Functionality commercially available, or assume any obligations
relating thereto. To the maximum extent permitted by law, the Qt Company assumes
no liability whatsoever regarding any Pre-Release Functionality. Any use thereof
is exclusively at Customer’s own risk and expense. 

7. USAGE VERIFICATION AUDIT RIGHTS

7.1. The Qt Company or an independent auditor acting on behalf of The Qt
Company, may, upon at least thirty (30) days’ prior written notice and at The Qt
Company’s expense, audit Customer with respect to the Customer’s use of the
Service, but not more frequently than once every six (6) months. Such audit may
be conducted by mail, electronic means or through an in-person visit to
Customer’s place of business. Any possible in-person audit shall be conducted
during regular business hours at Customer’s facilities, shall not unreasonably
interfere with Customer’s business activities, and shall be limited in scope to
verify Customer’s compliance with the Agreement. The Qt Company or its
independent auditor shall be entitled to inspect Customer’s Records and conduct
necessary interviews of Customer’s relevant employees and Contractors. All such
Customer’s Records and use thereof shall be subject to the obligation of
confidentiality under the Agreement.  

7.2. If an audit reveals that Customer is using the Service beyond scope of the
Agreement, Customer shall pay to The Qt Company any amounts commensurate for
such unauthorized use within thirty (30) days from receipt of the corresponding
invoice from The Qt Company.   

7.3. In addition, in the event the audit reveals a material violation of the
terms of the Agreement, including underpayment of more than ten percent (10%) or
10,000 euros (whichever is more) for use of the Service, Customer shall pay The
Qt Company's reasonable costs of conducting such audit.  

8. SUBSCRIPTION TERM

8.1. Services subscriptions are provided for twelve (12) month terms
(“Subscription Term”) unless a different Subscription Term is set forth in the
Purchase Document. The initial Subscription Term will commence on the date set
forth in the Purchase Document. 

8.2. Upon expiration of the initial Subscription Term, the Subscription Term
shall be automatically renewed for one or more additional renewal Subscription
Terms, unless and until either Party notifies the other Party in writingthat it
does not wish to renew the Subscription Term, such notification to be provided
to the other Party no less than thirty (30) days before expiration of the
respective Subscription Term. The Qt Company shall, in good time before the due
date for the above notification, remind  Customer of the coming renewal
Subscription Term. Unless otherwise agreed between the Parties, renewal
Subscription Term shall be twelve (12) months. 

8.3. Any such renewal Subscription Term shall be subject to Services Fees agreed
between the Parties in writing or, if no advance agreement exists, subject to
The Qt Company’s standard list pricing applicable at the commencement date of
any such renewal Subscription Term. 

8.4. Subscription Term(s) include a maximum number of events that may be
collected via the Services, as set forth in the Purchase Document. Upon
expiration of the applicable Subscription Term, any unused Events capabilities
expire and The Qt Company will not provide any refund for unused Events
capabilities. With regards to Retention periods provided during a Subscription
Term, such Retention period expires upon expiration or termination of the
Subscription Term, unless otherwise agreed between the parties in writing and
subject to any fees for purchase of further Retention capabilities.  

9. RIGHTS AND DUTIES UPON TERMINATION 

9.1. Upon expiry or termination of this Appendix, all rights and obligations of
the Parties will be terminated. Customer must terminate the traffic from
Applications to the Insight Cloud immediately upon termination or expiration of
this Appendix or the applicable subscription term, failing which The Qt Company
reserves the right to charge for resulting costs accrued to The Qt Company with
reasonable margin. 

9.2. Upon expiry or termination of this Appendix, Customer and all Designated
Users shall cease using the Service, including use of Insight Service or the
Tracker Library on any Application. Upon such termination or expiration,
Customer will cease using the Qt Insight Cloud or Qt Insight Private Cloud.
Where Customer utilized the Insight Private Cloud, Customer shall destroy all
copies of the Qt Insight Private Cloud and all related materials and will, upon
request of The Qt Company, certify as such by Customer’s duly authorized
officer. 

9.3. Expiry or termination of this Appendix or the Agreement for any reason
whatsoever shall not relieve Customer of its obligation to pay any Service Fees
accrued or payable to The Qt Company under any existing or outstanding Purchase
Document in effect prior to the effective date of termination, nor its
obligation to pay any fees related to termination non-compliance (e.g., Tracker
Library Terms non-compliance) and Customer will pay to The Qt Company all such
unpaid fees within thirty (30) days from the effective date of termination of
the Service Subscription Term or this Appendix, as applicable.  

9.4. Termination of this Appendix shall not affect the rights of Customer’s End
Users to continue use of Applications so long as Customer deactivates usage of
the Tracker Library in accordance with the Tracker Library Terms. 

10. SUSPENSION OF RIGHTS. The Qt Company reserves the right to suspend access,
or withhold grants of all rights to the Service hereunder, should Customer
violate or is reasonably suspected of violating its obligations (including
payment obligations) under, or the terms of, the Agreement (including this
Appendix and the DPA), and where such violation or breach is not cured within
ten (10) business days following The Qt Company’s written notice thereof,
provided that, in the event that the violation or breach endangers the Insight
Cloud hosting environment or the viability of the Service (“critical
violation”), The Qt Company may immediate suspend access until resolution of
such critical violation or the expiration of the Service term, whichever is
sooner.

Appendix for Support Terms Version 2024-10, compliant with Qt License Agreement
4, Qt Frame Agreement 2023-06 or later

1. The Qt Company provides support services to Customer for Services purchased
under the Agreement, in accordance with this Appendix for Support Terms
(“Support Terms”). The Qt Company provides handling of reported issues as
defined below (collectively, "Support") and Maintenance (as set forth herein).
Any product-specific support distinctions from the general support outlined
herein are set forth in the product-specific Exhibits to these Support Terms.

1.1. From time to time, The Qt Company may change these Support Terms, provided
that during the respective ongoing Support period, the level of Support will not
be materially reduced without the consent of Customer. Support Term updates may
be provided online at www.qt.io/terms-conditions/support-terms. In the event
that the online Support Terms provide better Support Services to Customer than
as set forth herein, the online Support Terms shall apply.

2. GENERAL DEFINITIONS

2.1.  “Business Day” means standard working days between Monday and Friday with
the exception of major public holidays in the region from where Support is
provided. 

2.2. “Customer Portal” means The Qt Company’s web-based service and support
interface located at account.qt.io or at another location designated by The Qt
Company. The Customer Portal is used by a Designated User with a registered Qt
Account, and can provide downloads, license management, license certificate and
other services, as applicable. Depending on the Services and type of support
purchased, a Designated User may be assigned certain roles (e.g., license
manager or support manager) for use of the Customer Portal.

2.3. “Documentation” means documentation available either: (i) at doc.qt.io or:
(ii) within or provided with Licensed Software. Separate Documentation is
available for each Major and Minor release as identified in the Documentation.

2.4. “Error” means an error, flaw, mistake, failure, or fault in the Services
that prevents it from behaving as described in the relevant Documentation. A
Designated User can follow the state and progress of Errors in the Customer
Portal.

2.5. “Extended Support” means the scope of support defined in Section 5.

2.6. “Maintenance” means releases or patches with quality and security updates,
but no new features. The Maintenance period for Licensed Software may vary
between products (e.g., release cadence for features and feature releases).
Maintenance periods and the extent of Maintenance are as in the
Services-specific Documentation. If nothing else is documented, the default
Maintenance period is one (1) year from the release date of the version (x.y.0,
either “Major” (x.) or “Minor” (.y.) release). 

2.7. “Pre-Release Functionality” means software provided for testing, preview,
check or validation purposes. Pre-Release Functionality in features or releases
may be labelled as “Alpha”, “Beta”, “Technology Preview”, “Experimental”,
“Playground”, “snapshot” or other such explicit terminology noting that the
software may not yet be ready for production or covered under Support.
Pre-Release Functionality may also be discontinued or deprecated without further
notice.

2.8. “Premium Support” means an upgraded level of Support that The Qt Company
provides pursuant to these Support Terms and the applicable Product Support
Appendix if: (i) Premium Support is available for the applicable Product and:
(ii) Customer has purchased Premium Support. Premium Support includes Standard
Support in addition to the Premium Support offerings. Premium Support must be
purchased for all Designated User(s) in the respective Customer team.    

2.9. “Qt Account” means the Qt Account of a Designated User for the purposes of
using the Services and the Customer Portal. 

2.10. “Response Time” means the period of time from when Customer notifies The
Qt Company about an Error or requests Support until The Qt Company provides
Customer with a response that addresses (but not necessarily resolves) the
reported Error or provides the requested Support.   

2.11. “Standard Support” means the standard level of Support that The Qt Company
provides pursuant to these Support Terms (including the applicable
product-specific support Exhibit) to Customer.

2.12. “Security Issue” means an Error that causes or reasonably could cause a
vulnerability in a system or application that uses the Services where such
vulnerability can or reasonably could impact the privacy and security of the
system or application. 

3. STANDARD SUPPORT

3.1. Subject to these Support Terms and the Agreement, during the term of
Customer’s active Services subscription(s), The Qt Company will, via its
Customer Portal, provide Designated User(s) with Support and Maintenance for
such active Services.

3.2. The Qt Company will make commercially reasonable efforts to solve any
Errors reported by Designated User(s) in the Licensed Software or Service.
Resolution of an Error may be product-dependent (e.g., downloading a later
released version of the Licensed Software or providing the Designated User with
a workaround or update addressing such Error).

3.3. The Qt Company shall only provide Support to Designated User(s) through the
Customer Portal. Support is generally made available for all Designated Users of
the Service.

3.4. Support is not provided for Pre-Release Functionality, any functionality
not under Maintenance or otherwise identified in the Documentation.

3.5. The Qt Company shall have no obligation to provide Support for: (i)
third-party components, platforms, hardware, Customer operating system-specific
problems, or problems arising from improper use, accident, neglect, or
modification of the Services; or (ii) third-party software or problems caused by
third-party software, even if such third-party software is distributed together
with the Services.

3.6. The Qt Company provides Support for Error(s) that are reported and that can
be reproduced or confirmed by The Qt Company, in each case on Platforms that are
documented as supported for the release of the Licensed Software.

3.7. Where any Support under this Appendix involves the handling of personally
identifiable data (e.g., in emails or metadata), all data will be processed in
accordance with The Qt Group Privacy Policy available at
www.qt.io/terms-conditions/privacy-policy.

3.8. The Qt Company does not provide data back-ups for Services unless
specifically stated otherwise in the applicable Services Appendix. 

3.9. Standard Support does not include (i) the implementation or execution of
release changes or adjustments for Customer; (ii) the training of Customer
users; or (iii) general user support on questions about the standard use of the
Services (e.g., concerning the operation and possible applications of Services).
Such additional services, to the extent The Qt Company agrees to provide them
upon Customer request, are subject to agreement between the Parties and separate
Purchase Documentation. 

4. ADDITIONAL SERVICES IN PREMIUM SUPPORT

4.1. Certain Services may provide optional additional Premium Support
subscriptions. When available and where Customer has purchased Premium Support
subscriptions, these Premium Support provisions apply in addition to the
applicable product-specific Support Exhibit. 

4.2. If third-party software is distributed together with Services, The Qt
Company will make commercially reasonable efforts to resolve problems in such
third-party software but cannot guarantee the resolution of third-party software
issues. The Qt Company does not provide Support for third-party software or
problems caused by third-party software not distributed together with Services. 

4.3. Designated User(s) will be assigned a Qt dedicated contact to handle
requests for Support. The dedicated contact may be subject to change (e.g., due
to sick leave, vacation and other similar reasons).

4.4. For certain Services, Designated User(s) may request The Qt Company to
access their computer remotely to provide Support directly. Where the Designated
User requests that The Qt Company remotely access their computer to provide
Support, the Designated User must have authority to grant The Qt Company such
remote access and Customer accepts that any remote access support is provided
as-is and at Customer’s own risk. 

4.5. Designated User(s) may request a Support session via chat or phone call in
Designated User’s support request to The Qt Company. 

4.6. Premium Support can provide assistance to Customer for the implementation
of new features, bug fixes and accessing patches in the Services, if applicable. 

4.7. All Support requests in Premium Support will be handled with high priority.

4.8. Premium Support is optional and purchased for an agreed bucket of hours
during a set term (“Bucket”). Hours can be used by any Designated User in the
respective development team and are provided during regular Business Days of The
Qt Company. Premium Support is provided for the duration of the purchased
Premium Support term and any unused hours expire upon termination or expiration
of the Premium Support term.

5. EXTENDED SUPPORT

5.1. Extended Support provides further Support for a release of Services that is
no longer generally supported (i.e., where the Maintenance period of the
Licensed Software version has expired). Extended Support is available for select
releases of Services as determined by The Qt Company.

5.2. Extended Support is provided under Standard Support terms and conditions,
unless Customer has purchased Premium Support in which case the Premium Support
terms and conditions apply. 

5.3. Extended Support is an additional optional offering purchased for certain
Services releases for the Extended Support term agreed between the Parties. 

5.4. An active Designated User license is required to utilize Extended Support.

6. RESPONSE TIMES

6.1. The Qt Company provides the following Response Times:   

Standard Support: Errors and Support requests will have a Response Time not to
exceed two (2) Business Days. Premium Support: Errors and Support requests will
have a Response Time not to exceed one (1) Business Day. Security Issues: Errors
that are Security Issues will have a Response Time not to exceed one (1)
Business Day. 6.2. For complex issues, The Qt Company may provide an initial
response to the Designated User and follow up, without undue delay, with
additional communication to address an Error and provide Support. 

7. CUSTOMER OBLIGATIONS 

7.1. To report an Error, the Designated User shall register the Error on the
Customer Portal. 

7.2. The Designated User must provide adequate information and documentation to
The Qt Company to enable it to recreate the Error or problem for which the
Designated User has sought assistance. 

7.3. The Designated User shall promptly respond to any requests from The Qt
Company for additional information regarding Errors.

8.  ERROR REPORTING

8.1. To ensure efficient handling of Errors, in reporting an Error, the
Designated User must provide the following information to The Qt Company (where
relevant to the Services for which the Designated User is seeking Support):   

A clear, detailed description of the problem, question or suggestion; Marking
the issue as a Security Issue, when reporting a Security Issue; Details of used
Service (detailed version information, host platform details, possible target
platform details, used features or modules, sample source code or scripts where
applicable) to enable The Qt Company to reproduce the Error; Additional relevant
content, such as traces, logs or screenshots, etc. should be included as
attachments. The preferred image formats are JPEG and PNG.  Compressed content
should be included in zip or tar.gz archives.  Executable content and documents
in platform-specific formats such as Microsoft Office® are not accepted; If
relevant, identification of the operating environment (e.g. operating system,
hardware Platform, build tools, tool configuration, etc.) on which the problem
exists. 9. HANDLING OF SECURITY ISSUES

9.1. A reported Error marked as a Security Issue will be assessed to determine
the severity and whether the Error is a Security Issue. The Designated User who
reported the Error as a Security Issue may be contacted for more details. If the
reported Error is not deemed to be a Security Issue by The Qt Company, it will
be treated as a normal Error and handled accordingly. Upon verification of a
Security Issue, The Qt Company will provide notification of the Security Issue
via appropriate channels.

9.2. A further notification, with a “Security Fix” for the current Licensed
Software versions under Maintenance will be issued thereafter. A Security Fix
may be a patch, workaround, best practice documentation, or other method as
reasonably determined by The Qt Company. A Security Fix will be issued as soon
as practically possible, dependent on the severity of the Security Issue. A
Security Fix may be included in the next release of Licensed Software.

9.3. If the Security Issue is reported in a third-party library used in Licensed
Software, The Qt Company will notify the relevant third party of such Security
Issue detected in their library. If and when the Security Issue is resolved in
the third-party library, the new version of the third-party library will be
included in the next feasible Maintenance release of the Licensed Software. If a
fixed version of the third-party library is not available or not feasible to
include in a Maintenance release, The Qt Company may instead provide
Documentation regarding the issue, or a patch for the third-party library.

9.4. All verified Security Issues in Licensed Software will be noted in
Documentation.

9.5. With regards to the Qt Insight Service, additional provisions regarding
Security Issues and the handling thereof are set forth in the Exhibit for Qt
Insight.

10. MAINTENANCE RELEASES, UPDATES AND UPGRADES

10.1. Active Support Customers are eligible for Maintenance and Updates.
Maintenance and Updates will be provided in accordance with the applicable
Service Appendix, Exhibit, and Documentation during the Customer’s subscription
term.  Maintenance releases typically include minor fixes and error corrections,
as well as Documentation updates. Updates may introduce new features to the
Services.

10.2. Upgrades are as defined in the relevant Agreement Appendix. Upgrades, if
any, may be provided at The Qt Company’s free and absolute discretion.

EXHIBIT for Qt Developer Framework Support and Design Tools 1. ADDITIONAL
DEFINITIONS

1.1. “Extended Security Maintenance” or “ESM” means an additional Maintenance
offering, which allows a valid Designated User to access Security Issue patches
provided through the Customer Portal applicable for a specified Service. 

1.2. ”Install Support” means Support that is limited to installation-related
Error(s) on Development Platforms specified as supported host platforms for each
Qt release under Documentation. 

1.3. “Platforms” means both Development Platforms and Deployment Platforms.
Supported host and target Platforms may vary for each Qt release as defined
under Documentation. 

2. STANDARD SUPPORT AND MAINTENANCE

2.1. By default, Maintenance (and Support for such Maintenance) is provided for
one (1) year from the release date of the Major or Minor version (x.y.0). Other
releases, e.g.  Long Term Support (LTS) releases provide Maintenance (and
Support for such Maintenance) for a period as communicated in conjunction with
the Documentation. 

2.2. Limitations with Install Support: Support is limited to Error(s) regarding
installation and setting up of the Qt development environment on host Platforms. 

3. EXTENDED SECURITY MAINTENANCE

3.1. ESM provides selected patches for verified Security Issues in a release of
Licensed Software that is no longer generally supported. ESM is available for
select releases, modules, and platforms of Licensed Software as The Qt Company
determines.

3.2. ESM is an additional offering purchased via an annual fee. ESM is specific
to Licensed Software release(s). 

3.3. For the avoidance of doubt, ESM does not include Extended Support. 

3.4. Only current and valid Designated Users (e.g., with active Services
licenses) may utilize ESM and access Security Issue patches provided through the
Customer Portal.

3.5. ESM is provided for verified Security Issues for which Security Fixes can
be issued. In the event of verified Security Issues that are dependent on
unsupported Third Party Software, products, operating systems, firmware,
hardware or the like (“Dependent Security Issue”), The Qt Company will inform
Customer of the verified Security Issues (including the Dependent Security
Issue) and undertake reasonable efforts to provide Security Fixes, but has no
obligation to and disclaims responsibility for providing Security Fixes for such
Dependent Security Issue.

EXHIBIT for Squish, Coco and Test Center Support 1. STANDARD SUPPORT AND
MAINTENANCE

1.1. Unless otherwise stated in Documentation, Maintenance (and Support for such
Maintenance) is provided for one (1) year from the release date of the Major or
Minor version (x.y.0), but for a maximum of two releases at a time.

1.2. Support is provided for standard and unmodified Licensed Software on
platforms defined in Documentation.

1.3. Standard Support is limited to Errors impacting the installation and
operational use of Squish, Coco and/or Test Center products. 

2. FURTHER CUSTOMER OBLIGATIONS. Where necessary to provide Support for the
Licensed Software, Customer will grant The Qt Company access to Customer’s
Licensed Software installation as well as to the hardware and operating system
of the Customer upon which these are installed. Additionally, Customer shall be
obligated to provide The Qt Company with a suitable infrastructure for remote
access to the Licensed Software in the event of an Error. Where Customer
requests that The Qt Company remotely access their installation and/or systems
to provide Support, Customer’s Designated User must have the authority to grant
The Qt Company such remote access and Customer accepts that any remote access
support is provided as-is and at Customer’s own risk.

EXHIBIT for Axivion Support 1. ADDITIONAL DEFINITIONS 

1.1. “Designated User” shall mean a named Customer user using a Qt Account and
the Customer Portal to access Technical Support.

2. GENERAL LIMITATIONS

2.1. The Qt Company has no obligation to provide Support: (i) where Errors are
caused by Customer’s application or external influences not under the control of
The Qt Company (e.g., virus infestation, Customer hardware or system defects);
or (ii) for the reconstruction of sets of data that Customer has not
sufficiently secured against loss.

2.2. Support for Axivion Products does not include the installation of Axivion
Products or of Updates. 

2.3. Additional expenses incurred by The Qt Company for the provision of
Support, such as work carried out on-site by The Qt Company that results from
the fact that Support cannot be performed at the originally agreed installation
site of the Axivion Products shall be borne by Customer. 

3. FURTHER CUSTOMER OBLIGATIONS. Where necessary to provide Support for the
Licensed Software, Customer will grant The Qt Company access to Customer’s
Licensed Software installation as well as to the hardware and operating system
of the Customer upon which these are installed. Additionally, Customer shall be
obligated to provide The Qt Company with a suitable infrastructure for remote
access to the Licensed Software in the event of an Error. Where Customer
requests that The Qt Company remotely access their installation and/or systems
to provide Support, Customer’s Designated User must have the authority to grant
The Qt Company such remote access and Customer accepts that any remote access
support is provided as-is and at Customer’s own risk.
  

EXHIBIT for Qt Insight Support 1. ADDITIONAL DEFINITIONS

1.1. “Platforms” means either the Insight Cloud or Insight Private Cloud, as
applicable to Customer. 1.2. “Security Issue” with regards to Qt Insight means
an Error that causes or reasonably may cause a vulnerability in a system or
application that uses the Tracker Library, or an Error that results in, or could
reasonably result in, access to Customer’s Events Personal Data. 

2. SUPPORT SERVICES

2.1. In providing Support for Qt Insight, The Qt Company will make commercially
reasonable efforts to address any Errors reported by Designated Users.
Resolution of an Error may be provided via Designated Users (for Insight Private
Cloud subscriptions) downloading a later released version of the applicable
Tracker Library, Insight Private Cloud, or, for Insight Cloud subscriptions,
providing the Designated User with a workaround or update addressing such Error.

2.2. In certain instances, Insight Cloud Customers may request that The Qt
Company Support access Customer’s instance of Insight Cloud and/or Customer’s
information stored on the Insight Cloud (e.g., for the purposes of potential
data recovery). In such a case, Customer must provide The Qt Company written
permission to access Customer’s Insight Cloud instance and information. Customer
is further: (i) responsible for ensuring that it is authorized to provide The Qt
Company such access; and (ii) aware and accepts that The Qt Company is not
responsible for any access restrictions or issues. The Qt Company does not
guarantee that Support efforts will be successful in recovering, restoring, or
reconstructing data.

3. SUPPORT LIMITATIONS

3.1. Support is provided for the duration of Customer’s Qt Insight Subscription
Term, subject to the applicable support structure limitations set forth in the
Qt Appendix for Insight Cloud and Insight Private Cloud, as applicable to
Customer’s Qt Insight Subscription Term.

3.2. Support is not provided for Pre-Release Functionality.

3.3. Customer is solely responsible for obtaining and maintaining the internet
connectivity necessary to utilize the Insight Cloud, and The Qt Company has no
obligation to provide support in connection with the performance of such
internet services.

3.4. For Insight Cloud Customers, The Qt Company will use best efforts to
provide Customer with support for cloud provider issues (e.g., platform
availability) but cannot guarantee the availability or capability of third-party
cloud provider platforms. The Qt Company does not provide any form of support
for cloud provider issues where Customer utilizes Insight Private Cloud.

3.5. The Qt Company does not provide Support for third-party software, services,
or problems caused by third-party software even if such third-party software is
distributed together with the Services. 

4. QT INSIGHT: HANDLING OF SECURITY ISSUES

4.1. A verified Security Issue in the Qt Insights Tracker Library, Insight
Cloud, or Insight Private Cloud will be resolved where practically possible. The
Qt Company will notify Customer via appropriate channels about the Security
Issue and the availability of a remedy for the affected Services. For Qt
Insights Tracker Library and Insight Private Cloud typically, a Security Fix for
the Security Issue may be included in the next release of affected Services. For
Qt Insights Tracker Library or Insight Private Cloud, it is Customer’s
obligation to install, implement, and deploy any release or Update provided by
The Qt Company.  With regard to a verified Security Issue in the Insight Cloud,
The Qt Company will seek to provide Customer with implementation of a Security
Fix.  

4.2. If the Security Issue is reported in a third-party component used in the
Services, including third-party platform providers, The Qt Company will notify
the relevant third party of the detected Security Issue and will work with
Customer and the third-party provider to document, resolve, or provide a
workaround: each in the event that The Qt Company can reasonably do so. If and
when a Security Fix is issued in the third-party component, the resolution will
be communicated to and (regarding the use of Insight Cloud) implemented for
Customer.  

5. MAINTENANCE RELEASES, UPDATES AND UPGRADES

5.1. Releases and updates will be provided in accordance with the applicable
Service during Customer’s subscription term. 

5.2. For Insight Cloud Customers, releases and updates will automatically be
applied to Customer’s instance of the Insight Cloud. 

5.3. For Insight Private Cloud Customers, The Qt Company will make Maintenance
available to Customer for Customer’s download and use (in accordance with the
use of Insight Private Cloud provisions of the Agreement).

Appendix for Professional Services Version 2024-02, compliant with Qt License
Agreement 4, Qt Frame Agreement 2023-10 or later

1. GENERAL

1.1. This Appendix for Professional Services is an integral part of the
Agreement and specifies the legal terms that are applied to the provision of The
Qt Company’s Professional Services for Customer, as further detailed (including
any services to be provided) in the applicable Purchase Document between the
Parties. 

1.2. Professional Services may be provided on a time-and-materials, fixed price
project, or flexible hours basis. Professional Services may include custom
support or development, consulting workshops, or training. The relevant
Professional Services method of delivery shall be set forth in the applicable
Purchase Document, as are any applicable additional terms applied to such
delivery methods. 

1.3. At the direction and discretion of The Qt Company, affiliates of The Qt
Company (“Qt Affiliates”) or Qt subcontractors may perform certain tasks related
to Professional Services, provided that The Qt Company shall at all times remain
responsible for the performance by Qt Affiliates and/or Qt subcontractors, as
well as compliance with the applicable terms and conditions of the Agreement by
the Qt Affiliates and Qt subcontractors. Any reference to The Qt Company in this
Appendix and applicable Purchase Documents shall be deemed to include applicable
Qt Affiliates and Qt subcontractors. 

1.4. The parties are independent contractors, not agents, partners or joint
venturers. Further, nothing in this Appendix or a Purchase Document is intended
to create any employment relationship between Customer and Qt-provided
Professional Services resources. 

2. DEFINITIONS

2.1. ”Background IP” shall mean any techniques, methods, ideas, concepts,
programs or other technology, including all copyrights, trademarks, patents and
other intellectual property rights therein of a Party or a third party that has
been generated prior to or outside the scope of the Professional Services
hereunder, and includes also any Background IPUpdates generated in the course of
performing Professional Services. 

2.2. “Background IP Updates” shall mean enhancements, new features,
improvements, refinements, configurations, or modifications to any Background
IP. 

2.3. “Deliverables” shall mean software and other material and products
delivered by The Qt Company to Customer via the Professional Services (including
any Results and Background IP, if any). 

2.4. “Professional Services” shall mean the professional services and any
Deliverables provided to Customer under the Agreement and Purchase Document. 

2.5. “Results” shall mean any software and other material and products
custom-generated by The Qt Company for Customer in the course of providing the
Professional Services.

3. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS

3.1. All rights to Background IP shall remain and be exclusively vested with the
respective Party or relevant third party rights-holder.  Customer grants to The
Qt Company the right to use Customer’s Background IP solely for the purpose of
performing the Professional Services and delivery of the agreed Deliverables.

3.2. To the extent that the Deliverables provided by The Qt Company hereunder
include and/or involve the use and optimization of The Qt Company’s or a
third-party’s Background IP: (i) Customer’s right to use such Background IP is
granted and governed by applicable standard license terms governing such
Background IP unless the parties have concluded a separate agreement to govern
The Qt Company’s Background IP (which may be contained in a separate Appendix to
the Agreement (the “Background IP License Agreement”), and (ii)  unless and to
the extent otherwise agreed in the Purchase Document, Customer is entitled to
use any Background IP Updates solely for its internal use, and shall not
distribute any Qt Background IP Updates to any third parties.

3.3. Unless and to the extent otherwise agreed in the Purchase Document, as
between the Parties, the copyright and all other intellectual property rights to
the Results shall be vested with the Customer.   

3.4. The Customer’s rights described in this Section 3 shall only be valid
provided that Customer duly pays to The Qt Company all applicable fees and
charges relating to the Professional Services.  

4. DELIVERY

4.1. Unless otherwise agreed, Professional Services shall be performed during
the normal business hours of The Qt Company (in the region where the
Professional Services are being performed) under The Qt Company’s standard
working methods and procedures, and legislation applicable to the Professional
Services personnel performing the work. 

4.2. Each Party shall contribute to the performance of the Professional Services
with respect to factors which are under the command or control of that Party.
Each Party undertakes for its own part to—without delay—make its decisions
necessary for the performance of the Professional Services. 

4.3. Professional Services shall be performed by qualified personnel and with
due diligence and oversight. 

4.4. If it has been agreed in the applicable Purchase Document that the
Professional Services are to be performed by a named individual and such
individual becomes, for a reason beyond The Qt Company’s control (e.g., change
of employment, prolonged illness or other similar reason) unavailable to provide
the Professional Services, then The Qt Company shall assign another individual
with adequate skills as a replacement resource for the Professional Services. If
The Qt Company is unable to assign such replacement to complete the Professional
Services, then either Party shall have the right to terminate the relevant part
of the applicable Purchase Document with immediate effect by providing written
notice thereof to the other Party.  In the event that Customer is responsible
for a signficant delay in the Professional Services engagement, The Qt Company
may re-assign, reschedule, or remove named individuals from the Professional
Services engagement. 

4.5. Acceptance criteria and procedure for the Deliverables and/or Professional
Services, if applicable, shall be specified in the Purchase Document. In the
event that Acceptance criteria and procedure are not specified in the applicable
Purchase Document, no acceptance criteria or procedure applies.  

5. CHANGES

Professional Services shall be perfomed pursuant to the agreed scope and time
schedule set forth in the Purchase Document, and any changes thereto shall be
subject to written approval by both Parties. For any change request, The Qt
Company shall provide a written plan on the effects of the change to the prices
and delivery schedule of the Professional Services, whereupon the Parties shall
both respectively consider whether or not to pursue with a proposed change. Any
change request and resulting written plan must be handled by each party without
undue delay. Until a change request and plan has been accepted in writing by
both parties, the Professional Services work shall continue in accordance with
the scope and time and schedule set forth in the Purchase Document. 

Where Customer is reponsible for providing the technical environment (including
but not limited to computers, software, data connections and interfaces)
relevant to the performance of the Professional Services, Customer shall not
make any changes to such technical environment without The Qt Company’s prior
written approval. Should Customer make any unauthorized change to the relevant
technical environment that hinder or impair the performance of the Professional
Services, The Qt Company may, at its option, choose to (i) suspend the
performance of Professional Services; (and/or ii) charge Customer for any
additional costs or work resulting from such unauthorized change. If Customer
fails to provide the necessary technical access, The Qt Company’s obligation to
provide Professional Services will be excused until access is provided.

Where The Qt Company is responsible for the technical environment relevant to
the performance of the Professional Services, The Qt Company may freely make any
changes to such technical environment provided that any such change do not
result in any additional costs for Customer or significant effect on the quality
of the Professional Services.

6. DELAY

6.1. In the event of a delay or likely delay relating to the Professional
Services, the party responsible for the delay or likely delay shall promptly
inform the other Party in writing of the expected delay and of the expected
effects of the delay on the agreed time schedule, whereupon the Parties shall
agree on updating the delivery schedule accordingly. 

6.2. If a material part of the delivery is delayed due to a reason attributable
to a Party and the Delivery does not take place within a reasonable extension of
time set by the non-breaching Party in writing, the non-breaching Party shall be
entitled to terminate the Purchase Document forthwith with respect to the
delayed Professional Services. In the event that Customer is responsible for the
delay, The Qt Company may charge the Customer for costs resulting from such
delay, should the delay materially impact the Professional Services engagement.
In the event of  cancellation by The Qt Company due to Customer delay, Customer
will only be entitled to a prorated refund calculated from the date of
termination.  

7. PRICES AND CHARGES

7.1. Prices for the Professional Services are specified in the Purchase Document
and/or in Pricing Appendix of the Agreement.  All payment obligations are
non-cancelable, and all fees and charges are, except as otherwise explictly
stated in this Appendix, non-refundable. Any professional services hours not
consumed upon expiration or termination of the relevant Purchase Document shall
expire in accordance with the applicable Professional Services structure set
forth in such Purchase Document. 

7.2. If any payment by Customer is delayed by more than thirty (30) days from
payment due date, The Qt Company shall be entitled to suspend its performance
without any liability until Customer has paid all amounts due to The Qt Company.
Alternatively, The Qt Company is entitled to terminate the relevant Purchase
Document with immediate effect. 

7.3. Unless otherwise agreed in writing, The Qt Company  shall be entitled to
adjust the price of the Professional Services by notifying the Customer of the
change in writing at least sixty (60) days before the effective date of the
change. If Customer does not accept the price change, the Customer shall be
entitled to terminate the Purchase Document for the respective Professional
Services in question on, or prior to, the effective date of the price change by
notifying The Qt Company thereof in writing at least thirty (30) days before the
effective date of the change. 

7.4. The prices exclude incurred travel, lodging, daily allowance and other
similar expenses (“Travel Expenses”).  The Qt Company is entitled to charge
Customer for incurred Travel Expenses (including travel time) and shall do so in
accordance with The Qt Company’s applicable travel and expense policy.   

7.5. If Customer requests that the Professional Services be performed outside
The Qt Company’s normal business hours, and should The Qt Company agree to
perform the Professional Services outside its normal business hours, The Qt
Company shall be entitled to charge additional charges (including applicable
overtime charges) for such extra-ordinary working hours. 

8. RECRUITMENT RESTRICTION

8.1. Neither Party may actively solicit for employment any individual of the
other Party actively engaged in the Professional Services (including a Party’s
contractors and service partners), until twelve (12) months have passed from the
termination or expiration of the relevant Purchase Document for such
Professional Services.   

8.2. In case of a breach of the recruitment restriction specified above, the
Party in breach shall be liable to pay to the other Party liquidated damages in
the amount corresponding to six (6) months salary (prior to applicable tax and
insurance deductions) of the recruited individual or, in case of breach by
Customer, in the amount corresponding to six (6) months of The Qt Company’s
Professional Services hourly list price based on a calculation of 40 hours per
week.

8.3. The recruitment restriction shall not be applied if: (i) the employment of
the individual in question has been terminated due to a reason attributable to
the employer; or (ii) if the recruitment results from the individual’s
application for a published open position without any solicitation by the
relevant party. 

9. VALIDITY AND TERMINATION

9.1. With regard to Professional Services, the Purchase Document shall expire
upon conclusion of the scope of work (whether fixed-term expiration, completion
of applicable tasks, or delivery of Deliverables) set forth in the Purchase
Document  and corresponding payment by Customer. 

9.2. Either Party may terminate the Purchase Document with immediate effect if
the other Party commits a material breach of the applicable contract terms and
has not remedied the breach within a reasonable period of time (which shall be
no less than 30 days) of the non-breaching Party’s written notice specifying the
breach. 

9.3. Expiration or termination of the Purchase Document for any reason
whatsoever shall not relieve Customer of its obligation to pay any fees accrued
or payable to The Qt Company under a Purchase Document in effect prior to the
effective date of termination, and Customer shall immediately pay to The Qt
Company all such fees upon the effective date of termination.

Appendix for Marketing Rights Version 2024-02, compliant with Qt License
Agreement 4, Qt Frame Agreement 2023-06 or later

Customer grants The Qt Company the right to use its entity name, logo, and
trademarks for The Qt Company’s marketing purposes, including but not limited to
advertising, promotions, and publicity efforts as follows:

1. LOGO. Customer agrees that The Qt Company may use and display Customer’s
name, logo, and trademarks (if applicable) on The Qt Company’s marketing
materials (e.g., websites, brochures, and marketing collateral), for the purpose
of identifying Customer as a Qt Company customer. Customer will provide any
applicable Customer branding guidelines to The Qt Company upon request of The Qt
Company and may require The Qt Company to correct any inappropriate use of
Customer’s name and/or logo.

2. SALES COLLATERAL. Customer agrees that The Qt Company may include Customer’s
name, logo, trademarks, and a description of Customer’s use of The Qt Company
products and services in sales presentations of The Qt Company to prospective
and existing customers and partners, to illustrate uses of The Qt Company’s
products or services.

3. JOINT MARKETING ACTIVITIES. Customer and The Qt Company will jointly
determine the marketing collaboration activities that will take place. Such
marketing collaboration activities may include, but are not limited to, case
studies, public relations and press releases, social media campaigns or posts,
speaking engagements, and joint event participation. Any marketing collaboration
activity content will be subject to Customer’s prior approval and the timing of
the joint marketing activities will be agreed on by Customer and The Qt Company.
Should Customer not approve of a joint marketing activity, Customer may withdraw
its consent to the joint marketing activity by providing prior written notice to
The Qt Company.  

Qt Appendix for Privacy and Security Version 2024-02, compliant with Qt License
Agreement 4, Frame Agreement 2023-06, or later. Applies for Qt Appendix for
Development Framework, Qt Appendix for Squish, Coco, and Test Center, and Qt
Appendix for Qt Insight.

1. Any capitalized terms used but not defined in this Qt Appendix for Privacy
and Security (“Appendix”) will have the meaning as set forth in the Agreement.
In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Agreement and this
Appendix, the Appendix shall govern. 

The Qt Company has implemented and will maintain the following technical and
organizational security measures:

2. INFORMATION SECURITY. The Qt Company will maintain an information security
program designed to (a) secure personal data against accidental or unlawful
loss, access, or disclosure, (b) identify reasonably foreseeable risks to the
security and availability of Qt systems, and (c) minimize physical and logical
security risks to Qt systems, including through regular risk assessment and
testing. The Qt Company will designate one or more employees to coordinate and
be accountable for the information security program.

3. ACCESS CONTROLS

3.1. All employees, contractors, and partners of The Qt Company will have access
to The Qt Company's systems and data on a need-to-know basis only.

3.2. Access to confidential information and data will be restricted based on
role-based access controls.

3.3. Processes for revoking access to systems and data when employees,
Contractors, or partners leave The Qt Company or no longer require access.

4. DATA PROTECTION

4.1. All sensitive data will be encrypted when stored or transmitted.

4.2. The Qt Company will implement controls to prevent the unauthorized
disclosure of confidential data.

4.3. The Qt Company will maintain backup and recovery procedures to ensure the
availability of critical systems and data.

5. INCIDENT MANAGEMENT

5.1. The Qt Company will implement an incident response plan (IRP) to identify,
contain, remediate, and report security incidents.

5.2. The IRP will be regularly reviewed and tested to ensure its effectiveness.

5.3. Procedures will be put into place to correct and avoid any deviations and
incidents.

5.4. All employees, contractors, and partners of The Qt Company will be required
to report suspected security incidents.

5.5. The Qt Company will implement and maintain a Business Continuity Policy
(BCP) designed to ensure the continuity of essential business functions and
minimize the impact of potential disruptions.

6. EMPLOYEES. The Qt Company will implement and maintain employee security
training programs regarding the Qt Company’s information security requirements.
The security awareness training programs will be reviewed and updated at least
annually.

7. CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT

7.1. Policies and procedures documents will be reviewed at least yearly and
after any internal testing. The Qt Company will update or alter its information
security program as necessary to respond to new security risks and to take
advantage of new technologies. 

7.2.  The Qt Company will perform regular external vulnerability assessments,
and will investigate identified issues and track them to resolution in a timely
manner. 

7.3. Before publicly launching new Services or significant new features of
Services, The Qt Company will perform application security reviews designed to
identify, mitigate and remediate security risks.

Qt Appendix for License Conversion Version 2024-02, compliant with Qt License
Agreement 4, Frame Agreement 2023-06, or later

1. Any capitalized terms used but not defined in this Appendix will have the
meaning as set forth in the Agreement. In the event of any conflict between the
terms of the Agreement and this Appendix, the Appendix shall govern.

2. By entry into this Appendix, Customer ’s existing Licensed Software licenses
specified below in Exhibit A (“Prior Licenses”) are replaced and superseded by
the licenses set forth in Exhibit B (“Current Licenses”).

3. Current Licenses are governed by the Agreement to which this Appendix is
attached and by entry into this Appendix, the Parties agree that any prior
licensing agreement between the Parties regarding Prior Licenses is replaced and
superceded by the Agreement.

4. Prices for Current Licenses are defined in the relevant Purchase Document. 

5. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Appendix or the Agreement,
entry into this Appendix does not affect any outstanding payment obligations by
Customer with respect to Prior Licenses. In addition to any payments due
pursuant to this Appendix, Customer  remains obligated to fulfill any and all
outstanding payment obligations to The Qt Company—including any outstanding
payments on the Prior Licenses.
